Ohio, session 136, HB513.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 164.07, 307.022, 307.671, 12
307.673, 307.674, 307.696, 308.21, 351.06, 353.03, 1506.44, 13
1710.02, 4115.03, 4115.034, 4115.04, 4115.06, 5540.03, 6117.012, 14
and 6121.061 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: 15
Sec. 164.07. (A) In awarding contracts for capital 16
improvement projects to be financed in whole or in part under 17
this chapter, a local subdivision shall comply with the 18
percentage requirements of section 125.081 of the Revised Code. 19
(B) A capital improvement that is financed in whole or in 20

H. B. No. 513 Page 2
As Introduced
part under this chapter is a public improvement, and a 21
subdivision undertaking a capital improvement is a public 22
authority, for purposes of section 4115.03 of the Revised Code. 23
All contractors and subcontractors working on a capital 24
improvement financed in whole or in part under this chapter 25
shall comply with sections 4115.03 to 4115.16 of the Revised 26
Code. 27
Sec. 307.022. (A) The board of county commissioners of any 28
county may do both of the following without following the 29
competitive bidding requirements of section 307.86 of the 30
Revised Code: 31
(1) Enter into a lease, including a lease with an option 32
to purchase, of correctional facilities for a term not in excess 33
of forty years. Before entering into the lease, the board shall 34
publish a notice that the board is accepting proposals for a 35
lease pursuant to this division once a week for three 36
consecutive weeks using at least one of the following methods: 37
(a) In the print or digital edition of a newspaper of 38
general circulation in the county; 39
(b) On the official public notice web site established 40
under section 125.182 of the Revised Code; 41
(c) On the web site and social media account of the 42
county. 43
The notice shall state the date before which the proposals 44
are required to be submitted in order to be considered by the 45
board. 46
(2) Subject to compliance with this section, grant leases, 47
easements, and licenses with respect to, or sell, real property 48
owned by the county if the real property is to be leased back by 49

H. B. No. 513 Page 3
As Introduced
the county for use as correctional facilities. 50
The lease under division (A)(1) of this section shall 51
require the county to contract, in accordance with Chapter 153., 52
and sections 307.86 to 307.92, and Chapter 4115. of the Revised 53
Code, for the construction, improvement, furnishing, and 54
equipping of correctional facilities to be leased pursuant to 55
this section. Prior to the board's execution of the lease, it 56
may require the lessor under the lease to cause sufficient money 57
to be made available to the county to enable the county to 58
comply with the certification requirements of division (D) of 59
section 5705.41 of the Revised Code. 60
A lease entered into pursuant to division (A)(1) of this 61
section by a board may provide for the county to maintain and 62
repair the correctional facility during the term of the 63
leasehold, may provide for the county to make rental payments 64
prior to or after occupation of the correctional facilities by 65
the county, and may provide for the board to obtain and maintain 66
any insurance that the lessor may require, including, but not 67
limited to, public liability, casualty, builder's risk, and 68
business interruption insurance. The obligations incurred under 69
a lease entered into pursuant to division (A)(1) of this section 70
shall not be considered to be within the debt limitations of 71
section 133.07 of the Revised Code. 72
(B) The correctional facilities leased under division (A) 73
(1) of this section may include any or all of the following: 74
(1) Facilities in which one or more other governmental 75
entities are participating or in which other facilities of the 76
county are included; 77
(2) Facilities acquired, constructed, or renovated by or 78

H. B. No. 513 Page 4
As Introduced
on behalf of the department of rehabilitation and correction or 79
the department of administrative services, or financed by the 80
treasurer of state, and leased to the county pursuant to section 81
307.021 of the Revised Code; 82
(3) Correctional facilities that are under construction or 83
have been completed and for which no permanent financing has 84
been arranged. 85
(C) As used in this section: 86
(1) "Correctional facilities" includes, but is not limited 87
to, jails, detention facilities, workhouses, community-based 88
correctional facilities, and family court centers. 89
(2) "Construction" has the same meaning as in division (B) 90
of section 4115.03 of the Revised Code. 91
Sec. 307.671. (A) As used in this section: 92
(1) "Bonds" means, as the context requires: general 93
obligation bonds of the county, or notes in anticipation 94
thereof, described in division (B)(1)(b) of this section; 95
revenue bonds of the port authority described in division (B)(2) 96
(a) of this section; and urban renewal bonds, or notes in 97
anticipation thereof, of the host municipal corporation 98
described in division (B)(3)(a) of this section. 99
(2) "Corporation" means a nonprofit corporation that is 100
organized under the laws of this state and that includes within 101
the purposes for which it is incorporated the authorization to 102
lease and operate facilities such as a port authority 103
educational and cultural facility. 104
(3) "Debt service charges" means, for any period or 105
payable at any time, the principal of and interest and any 106

H. B. No. 513 Page 5
As Introduced
premium due on bonds for that period or payable at that time 107
whether due at maturity or upon mandatory redemption, together 108
with any required deposits to reserves for the payment of 109
principal of and interest on such bonds, and includes any 110
payments required by the port authority to satisfy any of its 111
obligations arising from any guaranty agreements, reimbursement 112
agreements, or other credit enhancement agreements described in 113
division (C) of this section. 114
(4) "Host municipal corporation" means the municipal 115
corporation within the boundaries of which the port authority 116
educational and cultural facility is located. 117
(5) "Port authority" means a port authority created 118
pursuant to the authority of section 4582.02 of the Revised Code 119
by a county and a host municipal corporation. 120
(6) "Port authority educational and cultural facility" 121
means a facility located within an urban renewal area that may 122
consist of a museum, archives, library, hall of fame, center for 123
contemporary music, or other facilities necessary to provide 124
programs of an educational and cultural nature, together with 125
all parking facilities, walkways, and other auxiliary 126
facilities, real and personal property, property rights, 127
easements, and interests that may be appropriate for, or used in 128
connection with, the operation of the facility. 129
(7) "Urban renewal area" means an area of a host municipal 130
corporation that the legislative authority of the host municipal 131
corporation has, at any time, designated as appropriate for an 132
urban renewal project pursuant to Chapter 725. of the Revised 133
Code. 134
(B) The board of county commissioners of a county, a port 135

H. B. No. 513 Page 6
As Introduced
authority, and a host municipal corporation may enter into a 136
cooperative agreement with a corporation, under which: 137
(1) The board of county commissioners agrees to do all of 138
the following: 139
(a) Levy a tax under division (N) of section 5739.09 of 140
the Revised Code exclusively for the purposes described in 141
divisions (B)(1)(c) and (d) of this section; 142
(b) Issue general obligation bonds of the county, or notes 143
in anticipation thereof, pursuant to Chapter 133. of the Revised 144
Code, for the purpose of acquiring, constructing, and equipping 145
the port authority educational and cultural facility and 146
contribute the proceeds from the issuance to the port authority 147
for such purpose. The cooperative agreement may provide that 148
such proceeds be deposited with and administered by the trustee 149
pursuant to the trust agreement provided for in division (C) of 150
this section. 151
(c) Following the issuance, sale, and delivery of the port 152
authority revenue bonds provided for in division (B)(2)(a) of 153
this section, and prior to the date certain stated in the 154
cooperative agreement which shall be the date estimated for the 155
completion of construction of the port authority educational and 156
cultural facility, pledge and contribute to the port authority 157
revenue from the tax levied pursuant to division (B)(1)(a) of 158
this section, together with any investment earnings on that 159
revenue, to pay a portion of the costs of acquiring, 160
constructing, and equipping the port authority educational and 161
cultural facility; 162
(d) Following such date certain, pledge and contribute to 163
the corporation all or such portion as provided for in the 164

H. B. No. 513 Page 7
As Introduced
cooperative agreement of the revenue from the tax, together with 165
any investment earnings on that revenue, to pay a portion of the 166
costs of the corporation of leasing the port authority 167
educational and cultural facility from the port authority. 168
(2) The port authority agrees to do all of the following: 169
(a) Issue revenue bonds of the port authority pursuant to 170
Chapter 4582. of the Revised Code for the purpose of acquiring, 171
constructing, and equipping the port authority educational and 172
cultural facility; 173
(b) Construct the port authority educational and cultural 174
facility; 175
(c) Lease the port authority educational and cultural 176
facility to the corporation; 177
(d) To the extent provided for in the cooperative 178
agreement or the lease to the corporation, authorize the 179
corporation to administer on behalf of the port authority the 180
contracts for acquiring, constructing, or equipping a port 181
authority educational and cultural facility; 182
(e) Use the revenue derived from the lease of the port 183
authority educational and cultural facility to the corporation 184
solely to pay debt service charges on the revenue bonds of the 185
port authority described in division (B)(2)(a) of this section. 186
(3) The host municipal corporation agrees to do both of 187
the following: 188
(a) Issue urban renewal bonds of the host municipal 189
corporation, or notes in anticipation thereof, pursuant to 190
Chapter 725. of the Revised Code for the purpose of acquiring 191
and constructing the port authority educational and cultural 192

H. B. No. 513 Page 8
As Introduced
facility and contribute the proceeds from the issuance to the 193
port authority for such purpose. The cooperative agreement may 194
provide that such proceeds be deposited with and administered by 195
the trustee pursuant to the trust agreement provided for in 196
division (C) of this section. 197
(b) To the extent provided for in the cooperative 198
agreement, contribute to the county, for use by the county to 199
pay debt service charges on the bonds of the county, or notes in 200
anticipation thereof, described in division (B)(1)(b) of this 201
section, any excess urban renewal service payments pledged by 202
the host municipal corporation to the urban renewal bonds 203
described in division (B)(3)(a) of this section and not required 204
on an annual basis to pay debt service charges on the urban 205
renewal bonds. 206
(4) The corporation agrees to do all of the following: 207
(a) Lease the port authority educational and cultural 208
facility from the port authority; 209
(b) Operate and maintain the port authority educational 210
and cultural facility pursuant to the lease; 211
(c) To the extent provided for in the cooperative 212
agreement or the lease from the port authority, administer on 213
behalf of the port authority the contracts for acquiring, 214
constructing, or equipping a port authority educational and 215
cultural facility. 216
(C) The pledges and contributions described in divisions 217
(B)(1)(c) and (d) of this section and provided for in the 218
cooperative agreement shall be for the period stated in the 219
cooperative agreement, but shall not be in excess of the period 220
necessary to provide for the final retirement of the port 221

H. B. No. 513 Page 9
As Introduced
authority revenue bonds provided for in division (B)(2)(a) of 222
this section and any bonds issued by the port authority to 223
refund such bonds, and for the satisfaction by the port 224
authority of any of its obligations arising from any guaranty 225
agreements, reimbursement agreements, or other credit 226
enhancement agreements relating to such bonds or to the revenues 227
pledged to such bonds. The cooperative agreement shall provide 228
for the termination of the cooperative agreement including the 229
pledges and contributions described in divisions (B)(1)(c) and 230
(d) of this section if the port authority revenue bonds provided 231
for in division (B)(2)(a) of this section have not been issued, 232
sold, and delivered within two years of the effective date of 233
the cooperative agreement. 234
The cooperative agreement shall provide that any revenue 235
bonds of the port authority shall be secured by a trust 236
agreement between the port authority and a corporate trustee 237
that is a trust company or bank having the powers of a trust 238
company within or outside the state. The county may be a party 239
to such trust agreement for the purpose of securing the pledge 240
by the county of its contribution to the corporation pursuant to 241
division (B)(1)(d) of this section. A tax levied pursuant to 242
division (B)(1)(a) of this section is not subject to diminution 243
by initiative or referendum or diminution by statute, unless 244
provision is made therein for an adequate substitute therefor 245
reasonably satisfactory to the trustee under the trust agreement 246
that secures the revenue bonds of the port authority. 247
(D) A pledge of money by a county under this section shall 248
not be net indebtedness of the county for purposes of section 249
133.07 of the Revised Code. 250
(E) If the terms of the cooperative agreement so provide, 251

H. B. No. 513 Page 10
As Introduced
any contract for the acquisition, construction, or equipping of 252
a port authority educational and cultural facility shall be made 253
in such manner as is determined by the board of directors of the 254
port authority, and unless the cooperative agreement provides 255
otherwise, such a contract is not subject to division (A) of 256
section 4582.12 of the Revised Code. The port authority may take 257
the assignment of and assume any contracts for the acquisition, 258
construction, and equipping of a port authority educational and 259
cultural facility that previously have been authorized by either 260
or both the host municipal corporation or the corporation. Such 261
contracts likewise are not subject to division (A) of section 262
4582.12 of the Revised Code. 263
Any contract for the acquisition, construction, or 264
equipping of a port authority educational and cultural facility 265
entered into, assigned, or assumed pursuant to this division 266
shall provide that all laborers and mechanics employed for the 267
acquisition, construction, or equipping of the port authority 268
educational and cultural facility shall be paid at the 269
prevailing rates of wages of laborers and mechanics for the 270
class of work called for by the port authority educational and 271
cultural facility, which wages shall be determined in accordance 272
with the requirements of Chapter 4115. of the Revised Code for 273
the determination of prevailing wage rates. 274
Sec. 307.673. This section applies only in a county in 275
which a tax is levied under section 307.697, 4301.421, 5743.024, 276
or 5743.323 of the Revised Code on July 19, 1995. 277
(A) As used in this section: 278
(1) "County taxes" means taxes levied by a board of county 279
commissioners under divisions (D) and (E) of section 307.697, 280
divisions (B) and (C) of section 4301.421, divisions (C) and (D) 281

H. B. No. 513 Page 11
As Introduced
of section 5743.024, and sections 5743.323, 5743.511, 5743.521, 282
5743.621, and 5743.631 of the Revised Code. 283
(2) "Corporation" means a nonprofit corporation organized 284
under the laws of this state and that includes among the 285
purposes for which it is incorporated the authority to acquire, 286
construct, renovate, repair, equip, lease, manage, or operate a 287
sports facility. 288
(3) "Cooperative agreement" means an agreement entered 289
into pursuant to this section. 290
(4) "Cost of a sports facility" means the cost of 291
acquiring, constructing, renovating, repairing, equipping, or 292
improving one or more sports facilities, including 293
reconstructing, rehabilitating, remodeling, and enlarging; the 294
cost of equipping and furnishing such a facility; and all 295
financing costs pertaining thereto, including the cost of 296
engineering, architectural, and other professional services, 297
designs, plans, specifications and surveys, and estimates of 298
costs; the costs of refinancing obligations issued by, or 299
reimbursement of money advanced by, the parties to the 300
cooperative agreement or other persons, the proceeds of which 301
obligations were used to pay the costs of the sports facility; 302
the cost of tests and inspections; the cost of any indemnity or 303
surety bonds and premiums on insurance, all related direct and 304
administrative costs pertaining thereto, fees and expenses of 305
trustees, depositories, and paying agents for the obligations, 306
capitalized interest on the obligations, amounts necessary to 307
establish reserves as required by the obligation proceedings, 308
the reimbursement of money advanced or applied by the parties to 309
the cooperative agreement or other persons for the payment of 310
any item of costs of the sports facility, and all other expenses 311

H. B. No. 513 Page 12
As Introduced
necessary or incident to planning or determining the feasibility 312
or practicability with respect to the sports facility; and any 313
other such expenses as may be necessary or incident to the 314
acquisition, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, 315
remodeling, renovation, repair, enlargement, improvement, 316
equipping, and furnishing of the sports facility, the financing 317
of the sports facility, placing the sports facility in use and 318
operation, including any one, part of, or combination of such 319
classes of costs and expenses. 320
(5) "Financing costs" has the same meaning as in section 321
133.01 of the Revised Code. 322
(6) "Obligations" means obligations issued or incurred to 323
pay the cost of a sports facility, including bonds, notes, 324
certificates of indebtedness, commercial paper, and other 325
instruments in writing, anticipatory securities as defined in 326
section 133.01 of the Revised Code, issued or incurred by an 327
issuer pursuant to Chapter 133. or 4582. of the Revised Code or 328
this section, or otherwise, to evidence the issuer's obligation 329
to repay borrowed money, or to pay interest, by, or to pay at 330
any future time other money obligations of, the issuer of the 331
obligations, including obligations of an issuer or lessee to 332
make payments under an installment sale, lease, lease-purchase, 333
or similar agreement. 334
(7) "Owner" means any person that owns or operates a 335
professional athletic or sports team, that is party to a 336
cooperative agreement, or that has a lease or other agreement 337
with a party to a cooperative agreement, and that commits to use 338
the sports facility that is the subject of the cooperative 339
agreement for all of the team's home games for the period 340
specified in that agreement. 341

H. B. No. 513 Page 13
As Introduced
(8) "Payments," when used with reference to obligations, 342
means payments of the principal, including any mandatory sinking 343
fund deposits and mandatory redemption payments, interest and 344
any redemption premium, and lease rentals, lease-purchase 345
payments and other amounts payable under obligations in the form 346
of installment sale, lease, lease-purchase, or similar 347
agreements. 348
(9) "Person" has the same meaning as defined in section 349
133.01 of the Revised Code. 350
(10) "Port authority" means a port authority created under 351
Chapter 4582. of the Revised Code. 352
(11) "Sports facility" means a facility, including a 353
stadium, that is intended to house or provide a site for one or 354
more major league professional athletic or sports teams or 355
activities, together with all spectator facilities, parking 356
facilities, walkways, and auxiliary facilities, real and 357
personal property, property rights, easements, leasehold 358
estates, and interests that may be appropriate for, or used in 359
connection with, the operation of the sports facility. 360
(B) The board of county commissioners of a county, the 361
legislative authority of a municipal corporation, a port 362
authority, a corporation, and an owner, or any combination 363
thereof, may enter into one or more cooperative agreements under 364
which the parties enter into one or more of the agreements 365
described in divisions (B)(1) to (5) of this section. 366
(1) The board of county commissioners agrees to do one or 367
more of the following: 368
(a) Levy a tax under division (D) or (E) of section 369
307.697, division (B) or (C) of section 4301.421, division (C) 370

H. B. No. 513 Page 14
As Introduced
or (D) of section 5743.024, or section 5743.323, 5743.511, 371
5743.521, 5743.621, and 5743.631 of the Revised Code and make 372
available all or a portion of the revenue from those taxes for 373
the payment of the cost of the sports facility or to make 374
payments on obligations; 375
(b) Issue or incur obligations of the county pursuant to 376
Chapter 133. of the Revised Code or this section; 377
(c) Make available all or a portion of the revenue from 378
those taxes or of the proceeds from the issuance of those 379
obligations to the municipal corporation, port authority, 380
corporation, or otherwise for the payment of the cost of a 381
sports facility or the payment of obligations; 382
(d) Acquire, construct, renovate, repair, equip, lease to 383
or from another person, and operate, directly or by a lease or 384
management contract with another person, one or more sports 385
facilities; 386
(e) To the extent provided in the cooperative agreement or 387
a lease with respect to a sports facility, authorize the 388
municipal corporation, port authority, corporation, or owner to 389
administer contracts for designing, planning, acquiring, 390
constructing, renovating, repairing, or equipping a sports 391
facility. 392
(2) The port authority agrees to do one or more of the 393
following: 394
(a) Issue or incur obligations of the port authority 395
pursuant to Chapter 133. or 4582. of the Revised Code or this 396
section; 397
(b) Make available all or a portion of the proceeds from 398
the issuance of those obligations to the municipal corporation, 399

H. B. No. 513 Page 15
As Introduced
county, or corporation for the payment of the cost of a sports 400
facility or the payment of obligations; 401
(c) Acquire, construct, renovate, repair, equip, lease to 402
or from another person, and operate, directly or by a lease or 403
management contract with another person, one or more sports 404
facilities; 405
(d) To the extent provided in the cooperative agreement or 406
a lease with respect to a sports facility, authorize the 407
municipal corporation, county, corporation, or owner to 408
administer contracts for designing, planning, acquiring, 409
constructing, renovating, repairing, or equipping a sports 410
facility. 411
(3) The legislative authority of the municipal corporation 412
agrees to do one or more of the following: 413
(a) Make available the revenue from taxes levied by the 414
legislative authority for the payment of the cost of a sports 415
facility or to make payments on obligations; 416
(b) Issue or incur obligations of the municipal 417
corporation pursuant to Chapter 133. of the Revised Code or 418
otherwise; 419
(c) Make available all or a portion of the proceeds from 420
the issuance of those obligations to the county, port authority, 421
corporation, or otherwise for the payment of the cost of a 422
sports facility or the payment of obligations; 423
(d) Acquire, construct, renovate, repair, equip, lease to 424
or from another person, and operate, directly or by a lease or 425
management contract with another person, one or more sports 426
facilities; 427

H. B. No. 513 Page 16
As Introduced
(e) To the extent provided in the cooperative agreement or 428
a lease with respect to a sports facility, authorize the county, 429
port authority, corporation, or owner to administer contracts 430
for designing, planning, acquiring, constructing, renovating, 431
repairing, or equipping a sports facility. 432
(4) The corporation agrees to do one or more of the 433
following: 434
(a) Issue or incur obligations; 435
(b) Make available all or a portion of the proceeds from 436
the issuance of those obligations to the county, port authority, 437
municipal corporation, or otherwise for the payment of the cost 438
of a sports facility or the payment of obligations; 439
(c) Acquire, construct, renovate, repair, equip, lease to 440
or from another person, and operate, directly or by a lease or 441
management contract with another person, one or more sports 442
facilities; 443
(d) To the extent provided in the cooperative agreement or 444
a lease with respect to a sports facility, agree that the 445
corporation will administer contracts for designing, planning, 446
acquiring, constructing, renovating, repairing, or equipping a 447
sports facility. 448
(5) The owner agrees to do one or more of the following: 449
(a) Use the sports facility that is the subject of the 450
cooperative agreement for all of the home games of the owner's 451
professional athletic or sports team for a specified period; 452
(b) Administer contracts for designing, planning, 453
acquiring, constructing, renovating, repairing, or equipping a 454
sports facility. 455

H. B. No. 513 Page 17
As Introduced
(C) Any obligations may be secured by a trust agreement 456
between the issuer of obligations and a corporate trustee that 457
is a trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company 458
in or outside this state and authorized to exercise corporate 459
trust powers in this state. Proceeds from the issuance of any 460
obligations or the taxes levied and collected by any party to 461
the cooperative agreement may be deposited with and administered 462
by a trustee pursuant to the trust agreement. 463
(D) Any contract for the acquisition, construction, 464
renovation, repair, or equipping of a sports facility entered 465
into, assigned, or assumed under this section shall provide that 466
all laborers and mechanics employed in the acquisition, 467
construction, renovation, repair, or equipping of the sports 468
facility shall be paid at the prevailing rates of wages of 469
laborers and mechanics for the class of work called for, as 470
those wages are determined in accordance with Chapter 4115. of 471
the Revised Code. 472
Sec. 307.674. (A) As used in this section: 473
(1) "Bonds" means: 474
(a) Revenue bonds of the port authority described in 475
division (B)(2)(a) of this section; 476
(b) Securities as defined in division (KK) of section 477
133.01 of the Revised Code issued by the host municipal 478
corporation, described in division (B)(3)(a) of this section; 479
(c) Any bonds issued to refund any of those revenue bonds 480
or securities. 481
(2) "Corporation" means a nonprofit corporation that is 482
organized under the laws of this state and that includes within 483
the purposes for which it is incorporated the authorization to 484

H. B. No. 513 Page 18
As Introduced
lease and operate facilities such as a port authority 485
educational and cultural performing arts facility. 486
(3) "Cost," as applied to a port authority educational and 487
cultural performing arts facility, means the cost of acquiring, 488
constructing, renovating, rehabilitating, equipping, or 489
improving the facility, or any combination of those purposes, 490
collectively referred to in this section as "construction," and 491
the cost of acquisition of all land, rights of way, property 492
rights, easements, franchise rights, and interests required for 493
those purposes, the cost of demolishing or removing any 494
buildings or structures on land so acquired, including the cost 495
of acquiring any land to which those buildings or structures may 496
be moved, the cost of public utility and common carrier 497
relocation or duplication, the cost of all machinery, 498
furnishings, and equipment, financing charges, interest prior to 499
and during construction and for not more than three years after 500
completion of construction, costs arising under guaranty 501
agreements, reimbursement agreements, or other credit 502
enhancement agreements relating to bonds, engineering, expenses 503
of research and development with respect to such facility, legal 504
expenses, plans, specifications, surveys, studies, estimates of 505
costs and revenues, other expenses necessary or incident to 506
determining the feasibility or practicability of acquiring or 507
constructing the facility, administrative expense, and other 508
expenses as may be necessary or incident to that acquisition or 509
construction and the financing of such acquisition or 510
construction, including, with respect to the revenue bonds of a 511
port authority, amounts to be paid into any special funds from 512
the proceeds of those bonds, and repayments to the port 513
authority, host county, host municipal corporation, or 514
corporation of any amounts advanced for the foregoing purposes. 515

H. B. No. 513 Page 19
As Introduced
(4) "Debt service charges" means, for any period or 516
payable at any time, the principal of and interest and any 517
premium due on bonds for that period or payable at that time 518
whether due at maturity or upon mandatory redemption, together 519
with any required deposits to reserves for the payment of 520
principal of and interest on those bonds, and includes any 521
payments required by the port authority to satisfy any of its 522
obligations under or arising from any guaranty agreements, 523
reimbursement agreements, or other credit enhancement agreements 524
described in division (C) of this section. 525
(5) "Host county" means the county within the boundaries 526
of which the port authority educational and cultural performing 527
arts facility is or will be located. 528
(6) "Host municipal corporation" means the municipal 529
corporation within the boundaries of which the port authority 530
educational and cultural performing arts facility is or will be 531
located. 532
(7) "Port authority" means a port authority created 533
pursuant to section 4582.22 of the Revised Code. 534
(8) "Port authority educational and cultural performing 535
arts facility" means a facility that consists of a center for 536
music or other performing arts, a theater or other facilities to 537
provide programs of an educational, recreational, or cultural 538
nature, or any combination of those purposes as determined by 539
the parties to the cooperative agreement for which provision is 540
made in division (B) of this section to fulfill the public 541
educational, recreational, and cultural purposes set forth 542
therein, together with all parking facilities, walkways, and 543
other auxiliary facilities, real and personal property, property 544
rights, easements, and interests that may be appropriate for, or 545

H. B. No. 513 Page 20
As Introduced
used in connection with, the operation of the facility. 546
(B) A host county, a host municipal corporation, and a 547
port authority may enter into a cooperative agreement with a 548
corporation under which, as further provided for in that 549
agreement: 550
(1) The host county may agree to do any or all of the 551
following: 552
(a) Levy and collect a tax under divisions (O) and (P) of 553
section 5739.09 of the Revised Code for the purposes, and in an 554
amount sufficient for those purposes, described in divisions (B) 555
(1)(b) and (c) of this section; 556
(b) Pay to the port authority all or such portion as 557
provided for in the cooperative agreement of the revenue from 558
the tax, together with any investment earnings on that revenue, 559
to be used to pay a portion of the costs of acquiring, 560
constructing, renovating, rehabilitating, equipping, or 561
improving the port authority educational and cultural performing 562
arts facility; 563
(c) Pledge and pay to the corporation all or such portion 564
as provided for in the cooperative agreement of the revenue from 565
the tax, together with any investment earnings on that revenue, 566
to be used to pay a portion of the costs to the corporation of 567
leasing the port authority educational and cultural performing 568
arts facility from the port authority. 569
(2) The port authority may agree to do any or all of the 570
following: 571
(a) Issue its revenue bonds pursuant to section 4582.48 of 572
the Revised Code for the purpose of paying all or a portion of 573
the costs of the port authority educational and cultural 574

H. B. No. 513 Page 21
As Introduced
performing arts facility; 575
(b) Acquire, construct, renovate, rehabilitate, equip, and 576
improve the port authority educational and cultural performing 577
arts facility; 578
(c) Lease the port authority educational and cultural 579
performing arts facility to the corporation; 580
(d) To the extent provided for in the cooperative 581
agreement or the lease to the corporation, authorize the 582
corporation to administer on behalf of the port authority the 583
contracts for acquiring, constructing, renovating, 584
rehabilitating, or equipping the port authority educational and 585
cultural performing arts facility; 586
(e) Use the revenue derived from the lease of the port 587
authority educational and cultural performing arts facility to 588
the corporation solely to pay debt service charges on revenue 589
bonds of the port authority issued pursuant to division (B)(2) 590
(a) of this section and to pay its obligations under or arising 591
from any guaranty agreements, reimbursement agreements, or other 592
credit enhancement agreements provided for in this section. 593
(3) The host municipal corporation may agree to do either 594
or both of the following: 595
(a) Issue its bonds for the purpose of paying all or a 596
portion of the costs of the port authority educational and 597
cultural performing arts facility, and pay the proceeds from the 598
issuance to the port authority for that purpose; 599
(b) Enter into a guaranty agreement, a reimbursement 600
agreement, or other credit enhancement agreement with the port 601
authority to provide a guaranty or other credit enhancement of 602
the port authority revenue bonds referred to in division (B)(2) 603

H. B. No. 513 Page 22
As Introduced
(a) of this section pledging taxes, other than ad valorem 604
property taxes, or other revenues for the purpose of providing 605
the funds required to satisfy the host municipal corporation's 606
obligations under that agreement. 607
The cooperative agreement may provide that the proceeds of 608
such securities or of such guaranty agreement, reimbursement 609
agreement, or other credit enhancement agreement be deposited 610
with and administered by the trustee pursuant to the trust 611
agreement authorized in division (C) of this section. 612
(4) The corporation may agree to do any or all of the 613
following: 614
(a) Lease the port authority educational and cultural 615
performing arts facility from the port authority; 616
(b) Operate and maintain the port authority educational 617
and cultural performing arts facility pursuant to the lease; 618
(c) To the extent provided for in the cooperative 619
agreement or the lease from the port authority, administer on 620
behalf of the port authority the contracts for acquiring, 621
constructing, renovating, rehabilitating, or equipping the port 622
authority educational and cultural performing arts facility. 623
(C) The pledge and payments referred to in divisions (B) 624
(1)(b) and (c) of this section and provided for in the 625
cooperative agreement shall be for the period stated in the 626
cooperative agreement but shall not extend longer than the 627
period necessary to provide for the final retirement of the port 628
authority revenue bonds referred to in division (B)(2)(a) of 629
this section, and for the satisfaction by the port authority of 630
any of its obligations under or arising from any guaranty 631
agreements, reimbursement agreements, or other credit 632

H. B. No. 513 Page 23
As Introduced
enhancement agreements relating to those bonds or to the 633
revenues pledged to them. The cooperative agreement shall 634
provide for the termination of the cooperative agreement, 635
including the pledge and payment referred to in division (B)(1) 636
(c) of this section, if the port authority revenue bonds 637
referred to in division (B)(2)(a) of this section have not been 638
issued, sold, and delivered within five years of the effective 639
date of the cooperative agreement. 640
The cooperative agreement shall provide that any port 641
authority revenue bonds shall be secured by a trust agreement 642
between the port authority and a corporate trustee that is a 643
trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company 644
within or outside the state but authorized to exercise trust 645
powers within the state. The host county may be a party to that 646
trust agreement for the purpose of better securing the pledge by 647
the host county of its payment to the corporation pursuant to 648
division (B)(1)(c) of this section. A tax levied pursuant to 649
section 5739.09 of the Revised Code for the purposes specified 650
in division (B)(1)(b) or (c) of this section is not subject to 651
diminution by initiative or referendum or diminution by statute, 652
unless provision is made for an adequate substitute reasonably 653
satisfactory to the trustee under the trust agreement that 654
secures the port authority revenue bonds. 655
(D) A pledge of money by a host county under this section 656
shall not be net indebtedness of the host county for purposes of 657
section 133.07 of the Revised Code. A guaranty or other credit 658
enhancement by a host municipal corporation under this section 659
shall not be net indebtedness of the host municipal corporation 660
for purposes of section 133.05 of the Revised Code. 661
(E) If the terms of the cooperative agreement so provide, 662

H. B. No. 513 Page 24
As Introduced
any contract for the acquisition, construction, renovation, 663
rehabilitation, equipping, or improving of a port authority 664
educational and cultural performing arts facility shall be made 665
in such manner as is determined by the board of directors of the 666
port authority, and unless the cooperative agreement provides 667
otherwise, such a contract is not subject to division (A)(18)(b) 668
of section 4582.31 of the Revised Code. The port authority may 669
take the assignment of and assume any contracts for the 670
acquisition, construction, renovation, rehabilitation, 671
equipping, or improving of a port authority educational and 672
cultural performing arts facility that had previously been 673
authorized by any of the host county, the host municipality, or 674
the corporation. Such contracts are not subject to division (A) 675
(18)(b) of section 4582.31 of the Revised Code. 676
Any contract for the acquisition, construction, 677
renovation, rehabilitation, equipping, or improving of a port 678
authority educational and cultural performing arts facility 679
entered into, assigned, or assumed pursuant to this division 680
shall provide that all laborers and mechanics employed for the 681
acquisition, construction, renovation, rehabilitation, 682
equipping, or improving of that facility shall be paid at the 683
prevailing rates of wages of laborers and mechanics for the 684
class of work called for by the port authority educational and 685
cultural performing arts facility, which wages shall be 686
determined in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 4115. 687
of the Revised Code for the determination of prevailing wage 688
rates. 689
Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary in section 690
123.281 of the Revised Code, construction services and general 691
building services for a port authority educational and cultural 692
performing arts facility funded completely or in part with money 693

H. B. No. 513 Page 25
As Introduced
appropriated by the state to the Ohio facilities construction 694
commission may be provided by a port authority or a corporation 695
that occupies, will occupy, or is responsible for that facility, 696
as determined by the commission. The construction services and 697
general building services to be provided by the port authority 698
or the corporation shall be specified in an agreement between 699
the commission and the port authority or corporation. That 700
agreement, or any actions taken under it, are not subject to 701
Chapters 123. or 153. of the Revised Code, but are subject to 702
Chapter 4115. of the Revised Code. 703
Sec. 307.696. (A) As used in this section: 704
(1) "County taxes" means taxes levied by the county 705
pursuant to sections 307.697, 4301.421, 5743.024, 5743.323, 706
5743.511, 5743.521, 5743.621, and 5743.631 of the Revised Code. 707
(2) "Corporation" means either of the following: 708
(a) A nonprofit corporation that is organized under the 709
laws of this state for the purposes of operating or constructing 710
and operating a sports facility in the county and that may also 711
be organized under the laws of this state for the additional 712
purposes of conducting redevelopment and economic development 713
activities within the host municipal corporation; 714
(b) A new community authority as defined in section 349.01 715
of the Revised Code. 716
(3) "Sports facility" means a sports facility that is 717
intended to house major league professional athletic teams, 718
including a stadium, together with all parking facilities, 719
walkways, and other auxiliary facilities, real and personal 720
property, property rights, easements, and interests that may be 721
appropriate for, or used in connection with, the operation of 722

H. B. No. 513 Page 26
As Introduced
the facility. 723
(4) "Construction" includes, but is not limited to, 724
providing fixtures, furnishings, and equipment and providing for 725
capital repairs and improvements. 726
(5) "Debt service charges" means the interest, principal, 727
premium, if any, carrying and redemption charges, and expenses 728
on bonds issued by either the county or the corporation to: 729
(a) Construct a sports facility or provide for related 730
redevelopment or economic development as provided in this 731
section; 732
(b) Acquire real and personal property, property rights, 733
easements, or interests that may be appropriate for, or used in 734
connection with, the operation of the facility; and 735
(c) Make site improvements to real property, including, 736
but not limited to, demolition, excavation, and installation of 737
footers, pilings, and foundations. 738
(6) "Host municipal corporation" means the municipal 739
corporation within the boundaries of which the sports facility 740
is located. 741
(B) A board of county commissioners of a county that 742
levies a tax under section 307.697, 4301.421, or 5743.024 of the 743
Revised Code may enter into an agreement with a corporation 744
operating in the county, and, if there is a host municipal 745
corporation all or a part of which is located in the county, 746
shall enter into an agreement with a corporation operating in 747
the county and the host municipal corporation, under which: 748
(1)(a) The corporation agrees to construct and operate a 749
sports facility in the county and to pledge and contribute all 750

H. B. No. 513 Page 27
As Introduced
or any part of the revenues derived from its operation, as 751
specified in the agreement, for the purposes described in 752
division (C)(1) of this section; and 753
(b) The board agrees to levy county taxes and pledge and 754
contribute any part or all of the revenues therefrom, as 755
specified in the agreement, for the purposes described in 756
division (C)(1) of this section; or 757
(2)(a) The corporation agrees to operate a sports facility 758
constructed by the county and to pledge and contribute all or 759
any part of the revenues derived from its operation, as 760
specified in the agreement, for the purposes described in 761
division (C)(2) of this section; and 762
(b) The board agrees to issue revenue bonds of the county, 763
use the proceeds from the sale of the bonds to construct a 764
sports facility in the county, and to levy county taxes and 765
pledge and contribute all or any part of the revenues therefrom, 766
as specified in the agreement, for the purposes described in 767
division (C)(2) of this section; and, if applicable 768
(3) The host municipal corporation agrees to expend the 769
unused pledges and contributions and surplus revenues as 770
described in divisions (C)(1) and (2) of this section for 771
redevelopment and economic development purposes related to the 772
sports facility. 773
(C)(1) The primary purpose of the pledges and 774
contributions described in division (B)(1) of this section is 775
payment of debt service charges. To the extent the pledges and 776
contributions are not used by the county or corporation for 777
payment of debt service charges, the county or corporation, 778
pursuant to the agreement provided for in division (B) of this 779

H. B. No. 513 Page 28
As Introduced
section, shall provide the unused pledges and contributions, 780
together with surplus revenues of the sports facility not needed 781
for debt service charges or the operation and maintenance of the 782
sports facility, to the host municipal corporation, or a 783
nonprofit corporation, which may be the corporation acting on 784
behalf of the host municipal corporation, for redevelopment and 785
economic development purposes related to the sports facility. If 786
the county taxes are also levied for the purpose of making 787
permanent improvements, the agreement shall include a schedule 788
of annual pledges and contributions by the county for the 789
payment of debt service charges. The county's pledge and 790
contribution provided for in the agreement shall be for the 791
period stated in the agreement but not to exceed twenty years. 792
The agreement shall provide that any such bonds and notes shall 793
be secured by a trust agreement between the corporation or other 794
bond issuer and a corporate trustee that is a trust company or 795
bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the 796
state, and the trust agreement shall pledge or assign to the 797
retirement of the bonds or notes, all moneys paid by the county 798
for that purpose under this section. A county tax, all or any 799
part of the revenues from which are pledged under an agreement 800
entered into by a board of county commissioners under this 801
section shall not be subject to diminution by initiative or 802
referendum, or diminution by statute, unless provision is made 803
therein for an adequate substitute therefor reasonably 804
satisfactory to the trustee under the trust agreement that 805
secures the bonds and notes. 806
(2) The primary purpose of the pledges and contributions 807
described in division (B)(2) of this section is payment of debt 808
service charges. To the extent the pledges and contributions are 809
not used by the county for payment of debt service charges, the 810

H. B. No. 513 Page 29
As Introduced
county or corporation, pursuant to the agreement provided for in 811
division (B) of this section, shall provide the unused pledges 812
and contributions, together with surplus revenues of the sports 813
facility not needed for debt service charges or the operation 814
and maintenance of the sports facility, to the host municipal 815
corporation, or a nonprofit corporation, which may be the 816
corporation, acting on behalf of the host municipal corporation, 817
for redevelopment and economic development purposes related to 818
the sports facility. The corporation's pledge and contribution 819
provided for in the agreement shall be until all of the bonds 820
issued for the construction of the facility have been retired. 821
(D) A pledge of money by a county under this section shall 822
not be indebtedness of the county for purposes of Chapter 133. 823
of the Revised Code. 824
(E) If the terms of the agreement so provide, the board of 825
county commissioners may acquire, make site improvements to, 826
including, but not limited to, demolition, excavation, and 827
installation of footers, pilings, and foundations, and lease 828
real property for the sports facility to a corporation that 829
constructs a sports facility under division (B)(1) of this 830
section. The agreement shall specify the term, which shall not 831
exceed thirty years and shall be on such terms as are set forth 832
in the agreement. The purchase, improvement, and lease may be 833
the subject of an agreement between the county and a municipal 834
corporation located within the county pursuant to section 153.61 835
or 307.15 of the Revised Code, and are not subject to the 836
limitations of sections 307.02 and 307.09 of the Revised Code. 837
(F) The corporation shall not enter into any construction 838
contract or contract for the purchase of services for use in 839
connection with the construction of a sports facility prior to 840

H. B. No. 513 Page 30
As Introduced
the corporation's adoption and implementation of a policy on the 841
set aside of contracts for bidding by or award to minority 842
business enterprises, as defined in division (E)(1) of section 843
122.71 of the Revised Code. Sections 4115.03 to 4115.16 of the 844
Revised Code apply to a sports facility constructed under this 845
section. 846
(G) Not more than one-half of the total costs, including 847
debt service charges and cost of operation, of a project 848
undertaken pursuant to an agreement entered into under division 849
(B) of this section shall be paid from county taxes. Nothing in 850
this section authorizes the use of revenues from county taxes or 851
proceeds from the sale of bonds issued by the board of county 852
commissioners for payment of costs of operation of a sports 853
facility. 854
(H) Division (G) of this section and the twenty-year 855
limitation prescribed in division (C)(1) of this section do not 856
apply in the case of taxes levied pursuant to division (E) of 857
section 307.697 of the Revised Code, division (C) of section 858
4301.421 of the Revised Code, division (D) of section 5743.024 859
of the Revised Code, division (C) of section 5743.323 of the 860
Revised Code, and sections 5743.511, 5743.521, 5743.621, and 861
5743.631 of the Revised Code. Notwithstanding anything to the 862
contrary in this section or any other section of the Revised 863
Code, revenue from the taxes levied pursuant to those provisions 864
shall be equally divided by the county among the sports 865
facilities that exist within the boundaries of the county during 866
the period that the taxes are levied. Unless documented by an 867
agreement with the applicable owner of a sports facility, such 868
division of revenue shall be made directly by the county 869
treasurer by payment to the respective owners of the sports 870
facilities. 871

H. B. No. 513 Page 31
As Introduced
Sec. 308.21. (A) The board of trustees of a regional 872
airport authority, the board of directors of a port authority, 873
or the legislative authority of a municipal corporation that 874
owns, operates, or maintains a qualifying airport may, by 875
resolution adopted before January 1, 2024, create an airport 876
development district for the purpose of developing and 877
implementing plans for public infrastructure improvements that 878
benefit the qualifying airport and to finance expenditures to 879
attract or retain airlines, increase the number of scheduled 880
flights to and from the qualifying airport, or increase use of 881
the airport by aircraft having greater passenger capacity or 882
greater first-class seating availability. The resolution shall 883
include a development plan for the district that, at minimum, 884
specifies all of the following: 885
(1) The manner in which the nonprofit corporation that is 886
to govern the district will be formed, operated, and organized; 887
(2) The manner in which the board of directors of the 888
nonprofit corporation that is to govern the district are 889
appointed; 890
(3) A plan for the public infrastructure improvements and 891
other expenditures to be financed by the district; 892
(4) A description of the territory of the district, which 893
shall consist of all parcels of real property that are located 894
within five miles of the qualifying airport. For the purpose of 895
this division, a parcel is located within five miles of a 896
qualifying airport if the distance between any portion of the 897
parcel and any portion of the qualifying airport is five miles 898
or less. 899
(B) After adopting a resolution under division (A) of this 900

H. B. No. 513 Page 32
As Introduced
section, the board of trustees of the regional airport 901
authority, board of directors of the port authority, or 902
legislative authority of the municipal corporation shall submit 903
a copy to the director of development. 904
(C) An airport development district is not a political 905
subdivision for any purpose prescribed in the Revised Code. A 906
district shall be considered a public agency under section 907
102.01 of the Revised Code and a public authority under section 908
4115.03 of the Revised Code. Districts are subject to sections 909
121.22 and 121.23 of the Revised Code, but are not subject to 910
sections 121.81 to 121.82 of the Revised Code. 911
Sec. 351.06. A facility to be constructed pursuant to this 912
chapter is a public improvement and a convention facilities 913
authority is a public authority for purposes of section 4115.03 914
of the Revised Code. All contractors and subcontractors working 915
on such facilities are subject to and shall comply with sections 916
4115.03 to 4115.16 of the Revised Code. A convention facilities 917
authority is a contracting authority for purposes of sections 918
307.86 to 307.91 of the Revised Code. 919
No convention facilities authority shall construct a 920
facility under this chapter unless the plans for the facility 921
provide for parking and transportation determined by the board 922
of county commissioners as adequate to serve that facility. 923
A convention facilities authority may do all of the 924
following: 925
(A) Adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the 926
conduct of its business; 927
(B) Adopt an official seal; 928
(C) Maintain a principal office within its territory; 929

H. B. No. 513 Page 33
As Introduced
(D) Acquire, purchase, construct, reconstruct, enlarge, 930
furnish, equip, maintain, repair, sell, exchange, lease or rent 931
to, lease or rent from, operate, or contract for the operation 932
by others of, facilities within its territory, and make charges 933
for the use of the facilities; 934
(E) Make available the use or services of any facility to 935
persons or governmental agencies on such terms and conditions as 936
the authority shall determine; 937
(F) By resolution of its board of directors, issue 938
convention facilities authority revenue bonds beyond the limit 939
of bonded indebtedness provided by law, payable solely from 940
revenues as provided in section 351.14 of the Revised Code, 941
unless the bonds are refunded by refunding bonds, for the 942
purpose of providing funds to pay the costs of any facility or 943
facilities or parts of any facility or facilities, and, if 944
moneys raised by taxation are not obligated or pledged for the 945
payment of those revenue bonds, to pay the costs of any facility 946
or facilities or parts of any facility or facilities pursuant to 947
Section 13 of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, and in order to 948
create or preserve jobs and employment opportunities and improve 949
the economic welfare of the people of the state; 950
(G) Maintain such funds as it determines necessary; 951
(H) Direct its agents or employees, when properly 952
identified in writing and after at least five days' written 953
notice, to enter upon lands within its territory in order to 954
make surveys and examinations preliminary to location and 955
construction of facilities, or other work for the purposes of 956
the convention facilities authority, without liability of the 957
authority or its agents or employees except for actual damage 958
done; 959

H. B. No. 513 Page 34
As Introduced
(I) Promote, advertise, and publicize the authority and 960
its facilities; 961
(J)(1) Adopt rules, not in conflict with general law, 962
governing the use of its property, grounds, buildings, 963
equipment, and facilities, and the conduct of its employees and 964
the public, in order to promote the public safety and 965
convenience in and about its facilities and grounds, and to 966
maintain order. Any such rule shall be posted at a prominent 967
place in each of the buildings or facilities to which it 968
applies. 969
(2) No person shall violate any lawful rule adopted and 970
posted as provided in this division. 971
(K) Acquire by gift or purchase, hold, lease, and dispose 972
of real and personal property and interests in the property in 973
the exercise of its powers and the performance of its duties 974
under this chapter; 975
(L) Acquire, in the name of the authority, by purchase or 976
otherwise, on such terms and in such manner as the authority 977
finds proper, or by the exercise of the right of appropriation 978
in the manner provided by section 351.22 of the Revised Code, 979
such public or private lands, including public parks, 980
playgrounds, or reservations, or parts thereof or rights 981
therein, rights-of-way, rights, franchises, easements, and 982
interests as it finds necessary or proper for carrying out this 983
chapter, and compensation shall be paid for public or private 984
lands so taken; 985
(M) Make and enter into all contracts and agreements and 986
execute all instruments necessary or incidental to the 987
performance of its duties and the execution of its powers under 988

H. B. No. 513 Page 35
As Introduced
this chapter provided that no construction contract or contract 989
for the purchase of goods or services shall be approved or 990
entered into by the authority prior to the adoption and 991
implementation of a policy on the set aside of contracts for 992
bidding by or award to minority business enterprises, as defined 993
in division (E)(1) of section 122.71 of the Revised Code; 994
(N) Employ managers, superintendents, and other employees 995
and retain or contract with consulting engineers, financial 996
consultants, accounting experts, architects, attorneys, and such 997
other consultants and independent contractors as are necessary 998
in its judgment to carry out this chapter, and fix their 999
compensation. All expenses of doing so shall be payable solely 1000
from the proceeds of convention facilities authority bonds and 1001
notes issued under this chapter, or from excise taxes and 1002
revenues. 1003
(O) Receive and accept from any governmental agency grants 1004
for or in aid of the purposes of the authority, and receive and 1005
accept aid or contributions from any source of money, property, 1006
labor, or other things of value, to be held, used, and applied 1007
only for the purposes for which such grants and contributions 1008
are made; 1009
(P) Engage in research and development with respect to 1010
facilities; 1011
(Q) Purchase fire and extended coverage and liability 1012
insurance for any facility and for the offices of the authority, 1013
insurance protecting the authority and its officers and 1014
employees against liability for damage to property or injury to 1015
or death of persons arising from its operations, and any other 1016
insurance the authority may agree to provide under any 1017
resolution authorizing its convention facilities authority 1018

H. B. No. 513 Page 36
As Introduced
revenue bonds or in any trust agreement securing the same; 1019
(R) Charge, alter, and collect rentals and other charges 1020
for the use or services of any facility as provided in section 1021
351.09 of the Revised Code; 1022
(S) If a tax proposed under section 5739.026 of the 1023
Revised Code is disapproved by the electors, request the board 1024
of county commissioners to dissolve the authority pursuant to 1025
section 351.03 of the Revised Code; 1026
(T) By resolution of its board of directors, levy any of 1027
the excise taxes authorized by division (B) or (C) of section 1028
351.021 of the Revised Code if authorized by the county 1029
commissioners, and issue convention facilities authority tax 1030
anticipation bonds beyond any limit of bonded indebtedness 1031
provided by law, payable solely from excise taxes levied 1032
pursuant to division (B) or (C) of section 351.021 of the 1033
Revised Code and revenues as provided in section 351.141 of the 1034
Revised Code. 1035
(U) Do all acts necessary or proper to carry out the 1036
powers expressly granted in this chapter. 1037
Sec. 353.03. A lake facilities authority may do all of the 1038
following: 1039
(A) Acquire by purchase, lease, gift, or otherwise, on 1040
such terms and in such manner as it considers proper, real and 1041
personal property necessary for an authorized purpose or any 1042
estate, interest, or right therein, within or without the 1043
impacted lake district; 1044
(B) Improve, remediate, maintain, sell, lease, or 1045
otherwise dispose of real and personal property on such terms 1046
and in such manner as it considers proper; 1047

H. B. No. 513 Page 37
As Introduced
(C) Request that the department of natural resources, the 1048
environmental protection agency, or the department of 1049
agriculture adopt, modify, and enforce reasonable rules and 1050
regulations governing impacted watersheds; 1051
(D) Employ such managers, administrative officers, agents, 1052
engineers, architects, attorneys, contractors, subcontractors, 1053
and employees as may be appropriate in the exercise of the 1054
rights, powers, and duties conferred on it, prescribe the duties 1055
and compensation for such persons, require bonds to be given by 1056
any such persons and by officers of the authority for the 1057
faithful performance of their duties, and fix the amount and 1058
surety therefor, and pay the surety; 1059
(E) Sue and be sued in its corporate name; 1060
(F)(1) Make and enter into all contracts and agreements 1061
and execute all instruments relating to the provisions of this 1062
chapter; 1063
(2) Except as provided otherwise under divisions (F)(2) 1064
and (3) of this section, when the cost of a contract for the 1065
construction of any building, structure, or other improvement 1066
undertaken by a lake facilities authority involves an 1067
expenditure exceeding fifty thousand dollars, and the lake 1068
facilities authority is the contracting authority, the lake 1069
facilities authority shall make a written contract after notice 1070
calling for bids for the award of the contract has been given by 1071
publication twice, with at least seven days between 1072
publications, in a newspaper of general circulation in the 1073
impacted lake district. Each such contract shall be awarded to 1074
the lowest responsive and responsible bidder in accordance with 1075
section 9.312 of the Revised Code. The board of directors by 1076
rule may provide criteria for the negotiation and award without 1077

H. B. No. 513 Page 38
As Introduced
competitive bidding of any contract as to which the lake 1078
facilities authority is the contracting authority for the 1079
construction of any building or structure or other improvement 1080
under any of the following circumstances: 1081
(a) There exists a real and present emergency that 1082
threatens damage to property or injury to persons of the lake 1083
facilities authority or other persons, provided that a statement 1084
specifying the nature of the emergency that is the basis for the 1085
negotiation and award of a contract without competitive bidding 1086
shall be signed at the time of the contract's execution by the 1087
officer of the lake facilities authority that executes the 1088
contract and shall be attached to the contract. 1089
(b) A commonly recognized industry or other standard or 1090
specification does not exist and cannot objectively be 1091
articulated for the improvement. 1092
(c) The contract is for any energy conservation measure as 1093
defined in section 307.041 of the Revised Code. 1094
(d) With respect to material to be incorporated into the 1095
improvement, only a single source or supplier exists for the 1096
material. 1097
(e) A single bid is received by the lake facilities 1098
authority after complying with the above provisions. 1099
(3) In addition to the exceptions to competitive bidding 1100
requirements under division (F)(2) of this section, a lake 1101
facilities authority may contract for the acquisition or 1102
construction of any property for an authorized purpose and for 1103
the leasing, subleasing, sale, or other disposition of the 1104
property in a manner determined by the lake facilities authority 1105
in its sole discretion, without necessity for competitive 1106

H. B. No. 513 Page 39
As Introduced
bidding or performance bonds. 1107
(4) With respect to any public improvement undertaken by, 1108
or under contract for, the lake facilities authority, the 1109
authority may elect to apply sections 4115.03 to 4115.21 of the 1110
Revised Code. 1111
(G) Accept aid or contributions from any source of money, 1112
property, labor, or other things of value, to be held, used, and 1113
applied only for the purposes for which the grants and 1114
contributions are made; 1115
(H) Apply for and accept grants, loans, or commitments of 1116
guarantee or insurance, including any guarantees of lake 1117
facilities authority bonds and notes, from the United States, 1118
the state, or other public body or other sources, and provide 1119
any consideration which may be required in order to obtain such 1120
grants, loans, or contracts of guarantee or insurance; 1121
(I) Procure insurance against loss to the lake facilities 1122
authority by reason of damage to its properties resulting from 1123
fire, theft, accident, or other casualties, or by reason of its 1124
liability for any damages to persons or property occurring in 1125
the construction or operation of facilities or areas under its 1126
jurisdiction or the conduct of its activities; 1127
(J) Maintain such funds or reserves as it considers 1128
necessary for the efficient performance of its duties; 1129
(K) Enforce any covenants, of which the lake facilities 1130
authority is the beneficiary, running with the land. 1131
(L) Issue securities for the remediation of an impacted 1132
watershed and directly related permanent improvements in 1133
compliance with Chapter 133. of the Revised Code, except that 1134
such bonds or notes may be issued only pursuant to a vote of the 1135

H. B. No. 513 Page 40
As Introduced
electors residing within the impacted lake district. The net 1136
indebtedness incurred by a lake facilities authority pursuant to 1137
this division may not exceed one-tenth of one per cent of the 1138
total value of all property within the territory comprising the 1139
impacted lake district as listed and assessed for taxation. 1140
(M) Issue lake facilities authority revenue bonds beyond 1141
the limit of bonded indebtedness provided by law, payable solely 1142
from revenues as provided in section 353.09 of the Revised Code 1143
for the purpose of providing funds to pay costs of any facility 1144
or facilities or parts thereof; 1145
(N) Advise and provide input to political subdivisions 1146
within the impacted lake district with respect to zoning and 1147
land use planning within the impacted lake district; 1148
(O) Enter into agreements for the management, ownership, 1149
possession, or control of lands or property to be used for 1150
wetland mitigation banking; 1151
(P) Adopt and modify rules and regulations to carry out 1152
the authority granted to the lake facilities authority under 1153
this section. 1154
Sec. 1506.44. (A) A board of county commissioners may use 1155
a loan obtained under division (C) of this section to provide 1156
financial assistance to any person who owns real property in a 1157
coastal erosion area and who has received a permit under section 1158
1506.40 of the Revised Code to construct an erosion control 1159
structure in that coastal erosion area. The board shall enter 1160
into an agreement with the person that complies with all of the 1161
following requirements: 1162
(1) The agreement shall identify the person's real 1163
property for which the erosion control structure is being 1164

H. B. No. 513 Page 41
As Introduced
constructed and shall include a legal description of that 1165
property and a reference to the volume and page of the deed 1166
record in which the title of that person to that property is 1167
recorded. 1168
(2) In accordance with rules adopted by the Ohio water 1169
development authority under division (V) of section 6121.04 of 1170
the Revised Code for the purposes of division (C) of this 1171
section and pursuant to an agreement between the board and the 1172
authority under that division, the board shall agree to cause 1173
payments to be made by the authority to the contractor hired by 1174
the person to construct an erosion control structure in amounts 1175
not to exceed the total amount specified in the agreement 1176
between the board and the person. 1177
(3) The person shall agree to pay to the board, or to the 1178
authority as the assignee pursuant to division (C) of this 1179
section, the total amount of the payments plus administrative or 1180
other costs of the board or the authority at times, in 1181
installments, and bearing interest as specified in the 1182
agreement. 1183
The agreement may contain additional provisions that the 1184
board determines necessary to safeguard the interests of the 1185
county or to comply with an agreement entered into under 1186
division (C) of this section. 1187
(B) Upon entering into an agreement under division (A) of 1188
this section, the board shall do all of the following: 1189
(1) Cause the agreement to be recorded in the county deed 1190
records in the office of the county recorder of the county in 1191
which the real property is situated. Failure to record the 1192
agreement does not affect the validity of the agreement or the 1193

H. B. No. 513 Page 42
As Introduced
collection of any amounts due under the agreement. 1194
(2) Establish by resolution an erosion control repayment 1195
fund into which shall be deposited all amounts collected under 1196
division (B)(3) of this section. Moneys in that fund shall be 1197
used by the board for the repayment of the loan and for 1198
administrative or other costs of the board or the authority as 1199
specified in an agreement entered into under division (C) of 1200
this section. If the amount of money in the fund is inadequate 1201
to repay the loan when due, the board of county commissioners, 1202
by resolution, may advance money from any other fund in order to 1203
repay the loan if that use of the money from the other fund is 1204
not in conflict with law. If the board so advances money in 1205
order to repay the loan, the board subsequently shall reimburse 1206
each fund from which the board advances money with moneys from 1207
the erosion control repayment fund. 1208
(3) Bill and collect all amounts when due under the 1209
agreement entered into under division (A) of this section. The 1210
board shall certify amounts not paid when due to the county 1211
auditor, who shall enter the amounts on the real property tax 1212
list and duplicate against the property identified under 1213
division (A)(1) of this section. The amounts not paid when due 1214
shall be a lien on that property from the date on which the 1215
amounts are placed on the tax list and duplicate and shall be 1216
collected in the same manner as other taxes. 1217
(C) A board may apply to the authority for a loan for the 1218
purpose of entering into agreements under division (A) of this 1219
section. The loan shall be for an amount and on the terms 1220
established in an agreement between the board and the authority. 1221
The board may assign any agreements entered into under division 1222
(A) of this section to the authority in order to provide for the 1223

H. B. No. 513 Page 43
As Introduced
repayment of the loan and may pledge any lawfully available 1224
revenues to the repayment of the loan, provided that no moneys 1225
raised by taxation shall be obligated or pledged by the board 1226
for the repayment of the loan. Any agreement with the authority 1227
pursuant to this division is not subject to Chapter 133. of the 1228
Revised Code or any requirements or limitations established in 1229
that chapter. 1230
(D) The authority, as assignee of any agreement pursuant 1231
to division (C) of this section, may enforce and compel the 1232
board and the county auditor by mandamus pursuant to Chapter 1233
2731. of the Revised Code to comply with division (B) of this 1234
section in a timely manner. 1235
(E) The construction of an erosion control structure by a 1236
contractor hired by an individual homeowner, group of individual 1237
homeowners, or homeowners association that enters into an 1238
agreement with a board under division (A) of this section is not 1239
a public improvement, as defined in section 4115.03 of the 1240
Revised Code, and is not subject to competitive bidding or 1241
public bond laws. 1242
Sec. 1710.02. (A)(1) A special improvement district may be 1243
created within the boundaries of any one municipal corporation, 1244
any one township, or any combination of municipal corporations 1245
and townships within a single county, or counties that adjoin 1246
one another, for the purpose of developing and implementing 1247
plans for public improvements and public services that benefit 1248
the district. A district may be created by petition of the 1249
owners of real property within the proposed district, or by an 1250
existing qualified nonprofit corporation. 1251
(2) If the district is created by an existing qualified 1252
nonprofit corporation, the purposes for which the district is 1253

H. B. No. 513 Page 44
As Introduced
created may be supplemental to the other purposes for which the 1254
corporation is organized. The corporation is considered a 1255
special improvement district only when it acts with respect to a 1256
purpose for which the district is created, and not when it acts 1257
with respect to any other purpose for which it is organized. 1258
(3) All territory in a special improvement district shall 1259
be contiguous; except that the territory in a special 1260
improvement district may be noncontiguous if at least one 1261
special energy improvement project or shoreline improvement 1262
project is designated for each parcel of real property included 1263
within the special improvement district. Additional territory 1264
may be added to a special improvement district created under 1265
this chapter for the purpose of developing and implementing 1266
plans for special energy improvement projects or shoreline 1267
improvement projects if at least one special energy improvement 1268
project or shoreline improvement project, respectively, is 1269
designated for each parcel of real property included within such 1270
additional territory and the addition of territory is authorized 1271
by the initial plan proposed under division (F) of this section 1272
or a plan adopted by the board of directors of the special 1273
improvement district under section 1710.06 of the Revised Code. 1274
(4) The district shall be governed by the board of 1275
trustees of a nonprofit corporation. This board shall be known 1276
as the board of directors of the special improvement district. 1277
(5) No special improvement district shall include any 1278
church property, or property of the federal or state government 1279
or a county, township, municipal corporation, or park district, 1280
unless the church or the county, township, municipal 1281
corporation, or park district specifically requests in writing 1282
that the property be included within the district, or unless the 1283

H. B. No. 513 Page 45
As Introduced
church is a member of the existing qualified nonprofit 1284
corporation creating the district at the time the district is 1285
created. 1286
(6) A shoreline improvement project may extend into the 1287
territory of Lake Erie as described in sections 1506.10 and 1288
1506.11 of the Revised Code. However, the state shall remain 1289
exempt from any special assessment that may be levied against 1290
that territory under section 1710.06 and Chapter 727. of the 1291
Revised Code. 1292
(7) More than one district may be created within a 1293
participating political subdivision, but no real property may be 1294
included within more than one district unless the owner of the 1295
property files a written consent with the clerk of the 1296
legislative authority, the township fiscal officer, or the 1297
village clerk, as appropriate. 1298
(8) The area of each district shall be contiguous; except 1299
that the area of a special improvement district may be 1300
noncontiguous if all parcels of real property included within 1301
such area contain at least one special energy improvement or 1302
shoreline improvement thereon. 1303
(B) Subject to division (A)(2) of this section, all of the 1304
following apply: 1305
(1) A district created under this chapter is not a 1306
political subdivision, except for purposes of section 4905.34 of 1307
the Revised Code. 1308
(2) A district created under this chapter shall be 1309
considered a public agency under section 102.01 and a public 1310
authority under section 4115.03 of the Revised Code. 1311
(3) Districts created under this chapter are not subject 1312

H. B. No. 513 Page 46
As Introduced
to sections 121.81 to 121.82 of the Revised Code. Districts 1313
created under this chapter are subject to sections 121.22 and 1314
121.23 of the Revised Code. 1315
(4) All records of the district are public records under 1316
section 149.43 of the Revised Code, except that records of 1317
organizations contracting with a district are not public records 1318
under section 149.43 or section 149.431 of the Revised Code 1319
solely by reason of any contract with a district. 1320
(C)(1) Subject to division (C)(2) of this section, both of 1321
the following apply: 1322
(a) Membership on the board of directors of the district 1323
shall not be considered as holding a public office. However, 1324
each member of the board of directors of a district, each 1325
member's designee or proxy, and each officer or employee of a 1326
district is a public official or employee under section 102.01 1327
and a public official under section 2921.42 of the Revised Code. 1328
District officers and district members and directors and their 1329
designees or proxies are not required to file a statement with 1330
the Ohio ethics commission under section 102.02 of the Revised 1331
Code. 1332
(b) Directors and their designees shall be entitled to the 1333
immunities provided by Chapter 1702. and to the same immunity as 1334
an employee under division (A)(6) of section 2744.03 of the 1335
Revised Code, except that directors and their designees shall 1336
not be entitled to the indemnification provided in section 1337
2744.07 of the Revised Code unless the director or designee is 1338
an employee or official of a participating political subdivision 1339
of the district and is acting within the scope of the director's 1340
or designee's employment or official responsibilities. 1341

H. B. No. 513 Page 47
As Introduced
(2) District officers and district members and directors 1342
of a district created by an existing qualified nonprofit 1343
corporation, and their designees or proxies, are public 1344
officials or employees under section 102.01 and public officials 1345
under section 2921.42 of the Revised Code by virtue of their 1346
positions with the corporation only when they act with respect 1347
to a purpose for which the district is created, and not when 1348
they act with respect to any other purpose for which the 1349
corporation is organized. 1350
(D) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the 1351
nonprofit corporation that governs a district shall be organized 1352
in the manner described in Chapter 1702. of the Revised Code. 1353
Except in the case of a district created by an existing 1354
qualified nonprofit corporation, the corporation's articles of 1355
incorporation are required to be approved, as provided in 1356
division (E) of this section, by resolution of the legislative 1357
authority of each participating political subdivision of the 1358
district. A copy of that resolution shall be filed along with 1359
the articles of incorporation in the secretary of state's 1360
office. 1361
In addition to meeting the requirements for articles of 1362
incorporation set forth in Chapter 1702. of the Revised Code, 1363
the articles of incorporation for the nonprofit corporation 1364
governing a district formed under this chapter shall provide all 1365
the following: 1366
(1) The name for the district, which shall include the 1367
name of each participating political subdivision of the 1368
district; 1369
(2) A description of the territory within the district, 1370
which may be all or part of each participating political 1371

H. B. No. 513 Page 48
As Introduced
subdivision. The description shall be specific enough to enable 1372
real property owners to determine if their property is located 1373
within the district. 1374
(3) A description of the procedure by which the articles 1375
of incorporation may be amended. The procedure shall include 1376
receiving approval of the amendment, by resolution, from the 1377
legislative authority of each participating political 1378
subdivision and filing the approved amendment and resolution 1379
with the secretary of state. 1380
(4) The reasons for creating the district, plus an 1381
explanation of how the district will be conducive to the public 1382
health, safety, peace, convenience, and welfare of the district. 1383
(E) The articles of incorporation for a nonprofit 1384
corporation governing a district created under this chapter and 1385
amendments to them shall be submitted to the municipal 1386
executive, if any, and the legislative authority of each 1387
municipal corporation or township in which the proposed district 1388
is to be located. Except in the case of a district created by an 1389
existing qualified nonprofit corporation, the articles or 1390
amendments shall be accompanied by a petition signed either by 1391
the owners of at least sixty per cent of the front footage of 1392
all real property located in the proposed district that abuts 1393
upon any street, alley, public road, place, boulevard, parkway, 1394
park entrance, easement, or other existing public improvement 1395
within the proposed district, excluding church property or 1396
property owned by the state, county, township, municipal, park 1397
district, or federal government, unless a church, county, 1398
township, municipal corporation, or park district has 1399
specifically requested in writing that the property be included 1400
in the district, or by the owners of at least seventy-five per 1401

H. B. No. 513 Page 49
As Introduced
cent of the area of all real property located within the 1402
proposed district, excluding church property or property owned 1403
by the state, county, township, municipal, park district, or 1404
federal government, unless a church, county, township, municipal 1405
corporation, or park district has specifically requested in 1406
writing that the property be included in the district. Pursuant 1407
to Section 2o of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, the petition 1408
required under this division may be for the purpose of 1409
developing and implementing plans for special energy improvement 1410
projects or shoreline improvement projects, and, in such case, 1411
is determined to be in furtherance of the purposes set forth in 1412
Section 2o of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution. Except as 1413
provided in division (H) of this section, if a special 1414
improvement district is being created under this chapter for the 1415
purpose of developing and implementing plans for special energy 1416
improvement projects or shoreline improvement projects, the 1417
petition required under this division shall be signed by one 1418
hundred per cent of the owners of the area of all real property 1419
located within the proposed special improvement district, at 1420
least one special energy improvement project or shoreline 1421
improvement project shall be designated for each parcel of real 1422
property within the special improvement district, and the 1423
special improvement district may include any number of parcels 1424
of real property as determined by the legislative authority of 1425
each participating political subdivision in which the proposed 1426
special improvement district is to be located. For purposes of 1427
determining compliance with these requirements, the area of the 1428
district, or the front footage and ownership of property, shall 1429
be as shown in the most current records available at the county 1430
recorder's office and the county engineer's office sixty days 1431
prior to the date on which the petition is filed. 1432

H. B. No. 513 Page 50
As Introduced
Each municipal corporation or township with which the 1433
petition is filed has sixty days to approve or disapprove, by 1434
resolution, the petition, including the articles of 1435
incorporation. In the case of a district created by an existing 1436
qualified nonprofit corporation, each municipal corporation or 1437
township has sixty days to approve or disapprove the creation of 1438
the district after the corporation submits the articles of 1439
incorporation or amendments thereto. This chapter does not 1440
prohibit or restrict the rights of municipal corporations under 1441
Article XVIII of the Ohio Constitution or the right of the 1442
municipal legislative authority to impose reasonable conditions 1443
in a resolution of approval. The acquisition, installation, 1444
equipping, and improvement of a special energy improvement 1445
project under this chapter shall not supersede any local zoning, 1446
environmental, or similar law or regulation. In addition, all 1447
activities associated with a shoreline improvement project that 1448
is implemented under this chapter shall comply with all 1449
applicable local zoning requirements, all local, state, and 1450
federal environmental laws and regulations, and all applicable 1451
requirements established in Chapter 1506. of the Revised Code 1452
and rules adopted under it. 1453
(F) Persons proposing creation and operation of the 1454
district may propose an initial plan for public services or 1455
public improvements that benefit all or any part of the 1456
district. Any initial plan shall be submitted as part of the 1457
petition proposing creation of the district or, in the case of a 1458
district created by an existing qualified nonprofit corporation, 1459
shall be submitted with the articles of incorporation or 1460
amendments thereto. 1461
An initial plan may include provisions for the following: 1462

H. B. No. 513 Page 51
As Introduced
(1) Creation and operation of the district and of the 1463
nonprofit corporation to govern the district under this chapter; 1464
(2) Hiring employees and professional services; 1465
(3) Contracting for insurance; 1466
(4) Purchasing or leasing office space and office 1467
equipment; 1468
(5) Other actions necessary initially to form, operate, or 1469
organize the district and the nonprofit corporation to govern 1470
the district; 1471
(6) A plan for public improvements or public services that 1472
benefit all or part of the district, which plan shall comply 1473
with the requirements of division (A) of section 1710.06 of the 1474
Revised Code and may include, but is not limited to, any of the 1475
permissive provisions described in the fourth sentence of that 1476
division or listed in divisions (A)(1) to (7) of that section; 1477
(7) If the special improvement district is being created 1478
under this chapter for the purpose of developing and 1479
implementing plans for special energy improvement projects or 1480
shoreline improvement projects, provision for the addition of 1481
territory to the special improvement district. 1482
After the initial plan is approved by all municipal 1483
corporations and townships to which it is submitted for approval 1484
and the district is created, each participating subdivision 1485
shall levy a special assessment within its boundaries to pay for 1486
the costs of the initial plan. The levy shall be for no more 1487
than ten years from the date of the approval of the initial 1488
plan; except that if the proceeds of the levy are to be used to 1489
pay the costs of a special energy improvement project or 1490
shoreline improvement project, the levy of a special assessment 1491

H. B. No. 513 Page 52
As Introduced
shall be for no more than thirty years from the date of approval 1492
of the initial plan. In the event that additional territory is 1493
added to a special improvement district, the special assessment 1494
to be levied with respect to such additional territory shall 1495
commence not earlier than the date such territory is added and 1496
shall be for no more than thirty years from such date. For 1497
purposes of levying an assessment for this initial plan, the 1498
services or improvements included in the initial plan shall be 1499
deemed a special benefit to property owners within the district. 1500
(G) Each nonprofit corporation governing a district under 1501
this chapter may do the following: 1502
(1) Exercise all powers of nonprofit corporations granted 1503
under Chapter 1702. of the Revised Code that do not conflict 1504
with this chapter; 1505
(2) Develop, adopt, revise, implement, and repeal plans 1506
for public improvements and public services for all or any part 1507
of the district; 1508
(3) Contract with any person, political subdivision as 1509
defined in section 2744.01 of the Revised Code, or state agency 1510
as defined in section 1.60 of the Revised Code to develop and 1511
implement plans for public improvements or public services 1512
within the district; 1513
(4) Contract and pay for insurance for the district and 1514
for directors, officers, agents, contractors, employees, or 1515
members of the district for any consequences of the 1516
implementation of any plan adopted by the district or any 1517
actions of the district. 1518
The board of directors of a special improvement district 1519
may, acting as agent and on behalf of a participating political 1520

H. B. No. 513 Page 53
As Introduced
subdivision, sell, transfer, lease, or convey any special energy 1521
improvement project owned by the participating political 1522
subdivision upon a determination by the legislative authority 1523
thereof that the project is not required to be owned exclusively 1524
by the participating political subdivision for its purposes, for 1525
uses determined by the legislative authority thereof as those 1526
that will promote the welfare of the people of such 1527
participating political subdivision; improve the quality of life 1528
and the general and economic well-being of the people of the 1529
participating political subdivision; better ensure the public 1530
health, safety, and welfare; protect water and other natural 1531
resources; provide for the conservation and preservation of 1532
natural and open areas and farmlands, including by making urban 1533
areas more desirable or suitable for development and 1534
revitalization; control, prevent, minimize, clean up, or mediate 1535
certain contamination of or pollution from lands in the state 1536
and water contamination or pollution; or provide for safe and 1537
natural areas and resources. The legislative authority of each 1538
participating political subdivision shall specify the 1539
consideration for such sale, transfer, lease, or conveyance and 1540
any other terms thereof. Any determinations made by a 1541
legislative authority of a participating political subdivision 1542
under this division shall be conclusive. 1543
Any sale, transfer, lease, or conveyance of a special 1544
energy improvement project by a participating political 1545
subdivision or the board of directors of the special improvement 1546
district may be made without advertising, receipt of bids, or 1547
other competitive bidding procedures applicable to the 1548
participating political subdivision or the special improvement 1549
district under Chapter 153. or 735. or section 1710.11 of the 1550
Revised Code or other representative provisions of the Revised 1551

H. B. No. 513 Page 54
As Introduced
Code. 1552
(H) The owner of real property that is part of a planned 1553
community or a condominium development is deemed to have signed 1554
the petitions required under division (E) of this section and 1555
division (B) of section 1710.06 of the Revised Code with respect 1556
to a special improvement district that is being created for the 1557
purpose of developing and implementing plans for shoreline 1558
improvement projects if the district and the projects have been 1559
approved through an alternative process prescribed by the 1560
bylaws, declarations, covenants, and restrictions governing the 1561
planned community or condominium development. Such an 1562
alternative process may consist of a vote of the owners 1563
association or unit owners association, the approval of a 1564
specified percentage of property owners, or any other procedure 1565
authorized by the bylaws, declarations, covenants, and 1566
restrictions governing the planned community or condominium 1567
development. 1568
As used in this division, "condominium development" and 1569
"unit owners association" have the same meanings as in section 1570
5311.01 of the Revised Code, and "planned community," "owners 1571
association," "bylaws," and "declaration" have the same meanings 1572
as in section 5312.01 of the Revised Code. 1573
Sec. 4115.03. As used in sections 4115.03 to 4115.16 of 1574
the Revised Code: 1575
(A)(A)(1) "Public authority" means any officer, board, or 1576
commission of the state, or any political subdivision of the 1577
state, authorized to enter into a contract for the construction 1578
of a public improvement or to construct the same by the direct 1579
employment of labor, or any institution supported in whole or in 1580
part by public funds and said sections apply to expenditures of 1581

H. B. No. 513 Page 55
As Introduced
such institutions made in whole or in part from public funds. 1582
(2) "Public authority" does not mean any of the following: 1583
(a) A political subdivision, unless the political 1584
subdivision elects under section 4115.04 of the Revised Code to 1585
be subject to the requirements of sections 4115.03 to 4115.21 of 1586
the Revised Code; 1587
(b) A special district, unless the special district elects 1588
under section 4115.04 of the Revised Code to be subject to the 1589
requirements of sections 4115.03 to 4115.21 of the Revised Code; 1590
(c) A state institution of higher education, unless the 1591
state institution elects under section 4115.04 of the Revised 1592
Code to be subject to the requirements of sections 4115.03 to 1593
4115.21 of the Revised Code. 1594
(B) "Construction" means any of the following: 1595
(1) Except as provided in division (B)(3) of this section, 1596
any new construction of a public improvement, the total overall 1597
project cost of which is fairly estimated to be more than the 1598
following amounts five million dollars adjusted biennially by 1599
the director of commerce pursuant to section 4115.034 of the 1600
Revised Code and performed by other than full-time employees who 1601
have completed their probationary periods in the classified 1602
service of a public authority: 1603
(a) One hundred twenty-five thousand dollars, beginning on 1604
September 29, 2011, and continuing for one year thereafter; 1605
(b) Two hundred thousand dollars, beginning when the time 1606
period described in division (B)(1)(a) of this section expires 1607
and continuing for one year thereafter; 1608
(c) Two hundred fifty thousand dollars, beginning when the 1609

H. B. No. 513 Page 56
As Introduced
time period described in division (B)(1)(b) of this section 1610
expires. 1611
(2) Except as provided in division (B)(4) of this section, 1612
any reconstruction, enlargement, alteration, repair, remodeling, 1613
renovation, or painting of a public improvement, the total 1614
overall project cost of which is fairly estimated to be more 1615
than the following amounts two hundred fifty thousand dollars 1616
adjusted biennially by the director pursuant to section 4115.034 1617
of the Revised Code and performed by other than full-time 1618
employees who have completed their probationary period in the 1619
classified civil service of a public authority: 1620
(a) Thirty-eight thousand dollars, beginning on September 1621
29, 2011, and continuing for one year thereafter; 1622
(b) Sixty thousand dollars, beginning when the time period 1623
described in division (B)(2)(a) of this section expires and 1624
continuing for one year thereafter; 1625
(c) Seventy-five thousand dollars, beginning when the time 1626
period described in division (B)(2)(b) of this section expires. 1627
(3) Any new construction of a public improvement that 1628
involves roads, streets, alleys, sewers, ditches, and other 1629
works connected to road or bridge construction, the total 1630
overall project cost of which is fairly estimated to be more 1631
than seventy-eight thousand two hundred fifty-eight dollars 1632
adjusted biennially by the director of commerce pursuant to 1633
section 4115.034 of the Revised Code and performed by other than 1634
full-time employees who have completed their probationary 1635
periods in the classified service of a public authority; 1636
(4) Any reconstruction, enlargement, alteration, repair, 1637
remodeling, renovation, or painting of a public improvement that 1638

H. B. No. 513 Page 57
As Introduced
involves roads, streets, alleys, sewers, ditches, and other 1639
works connected to road or bridge construction, the total 1640
overall project cost of which is fairly estimated to be more 1641
than twenty-three thousand four hundred forty-seven dollars 1642
adjusted biennially by the director of commerce pursuant to 1643
section 4115.034 of the Revised Code and performed by other than 1644
full-time employees who have completed their probationary 1645
periods in the classified service of a public authority. 1646
(C) "Public improvement" includes all buildings, roads, 1647
streets, alleys, sewers, ditches, sewage disposal plants, water 1648
works, and all other structures or works constructed by a public 1649
authority of the state or any political subdivision thereof or 1650
by any person who, pursuant to a contract with a public 1651
authority, constructs any structure for a public authority of 1652
the state or a political subdivision thereof. When a public 1653
authority rents or leases a newly constructed structure within 1654
six months after completion of such construction, all work 1655
performed on such structure to suit it for occupancy by a public 1656
authority is a "public improvement." "Public improvement" does 1657
not include an improvement authorized by section 940.06 of the 1658
Revised Code that is constructed pursuant to a contract with a 1659
soil and water conservation district, as defined in section 1660
940.01 of the Revised Code, or performed as a result of a 1661
petition filed pursuant to Chapter 6131., 6133., or 6135. of the 1662
Revised Code, wherein no less than seventy-five per cent of the 1663
project is located on private land and no less than seventy-five 1664
per cent of the cost of the improvement is paid for by private 1665
property owners pursuant to Chapter 940., 6131., 6133., or 6135. 1666
of the Revised Code. 1667
(D) "Locality" means the county wherein the physical work 1668
upon any public improvement is being performed. 1669

H. B. No. 513 Page 58
As Introduced
(E) "Prevailing wages" means the sum of the following: 1670
(1) The basic hourly rate of pay; 1671
(2) The rate of contribution irrevocably made by a 1672
contractor or subcontractor to a trustee or to a third person 1673
pursuant to a fund, plan, or program; 1674
(3) The rate of costs to the contractor or subcontractor 1675
which may be reasonably anticipated in providing the following 1676
fringe benefits to laborers and mechanics pursuant to an 1677
enforceable commitment to carry out a financially responsible 1678
plan or program which was communicated in writing to the 1679
laborers and mechanics affected: 1680
(a) Medical or hospital care or insurance to provide such; 1681
(b) Pensions on retirement or death or insurance to 1682
provide such; 1683
(c) Compensation for injuries or illnesses resulting from 1684
occupational activities if it is in addition to that coverage 1685
required by Chapters 4121. and 4123. of the Revised Code; 1686
(d) Supplemental unemployment benefits that are in 1687
addition to those required by Chapter 4141. of the Revised Code; 1688
(e) Life insurance; 1689
(f) Disability and sickness insurance; 1690
(g) Accident insurance; 1691
(h) Vacation and holiday pay; 1692
(i) Defraying of costs for apprenticeship or other similar 1693
training programs which are beneficial only to the laborers and 1694
mechanics affected; 1695

H. B. No. 513 Page 59
As Introduced
(j) Other bona fide fringe benefits. 1696
None of the benefits enumerated in division (E)(3) of this 1697
section may be considered in the determination of prevailing 1698
wages if federal, state, or local law requires contractors or 1699
subcontractors to provide any of such benefits. 1700
(F) "Interested party," with respect to a particular 1701
contract for construction of a public improvement, means: 1702
(1) Any person who submits a bid for the purpose of 1703
securing the award of the contract; 1704
(2) Any person acting as a subcontractor of a person 1705
described in division (F)(1) of this section; 1706
(3) Any bona fide organization of labor which has as 1707
members or is authorized to represent employees of a person 1708
described in division (F)(1) or (2) of this section and which 1709
exists, in whole or in part, for the purpose of negotiating with 1710
employers concerning the wages, hours, or terms and conditions 1711
of employment of employees; 1712
(4) Any association having as members any of the persons 1713
described in division (F)(1) or (2) of this section. 1714
(G) Except as used in division (A) of this section, 1715
"officer" means an individual who has an ownership interest or 1716
holds an office of trust, command, or authority in a 1717
corporation, business trust, partnership, or association. 1718
(H) "Political subdivision" has the same meaning as in 1719
section 9.23 of the Revised Code. 1720
(I) "State institution of higher education" has the same 1721
meaning as in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code. 1722

H. B. No. 513 Page 60
As Introduced
Sec. 4115.034. On For projects described in divisions (B) 1723
(3) and (4) of section 4115.03 of the Revised Code, on January 1724
1, 1996, and the first day of January of every even-numbered 1725
year thereafter, and for projects described in divisions (B)(1) 1726
and (2) of section 4115.03 of the Revised Code, on the first day 1727
of January of the first even-numbered year occurring after the 1728
effective date of this amendment, and the first day of January 1729
of every even-numbered year thereafter, the director of commerce 1730
shall adjust the threshold levels for which public improvement 1731
projects are subject to sections 4115.03 to 4115.16 of the 1732
Revised Code as set forth in divisions (B)(3) and (4) division 1733
(B) of section 4115.03 of the Revised Code. The director shall 1734
adjust those amounts according to the average increase or 1735
decrease for each of the two years immediately preceding the 1736
adjustment as set forth in the construction cost index published 1737
by the engineering news-record or, should that index cease to be 1738
published, a similar recognized industry index chosen by the 1739
director, provided that no increase or decrease for any year 1740
shall exceed three per cent of the threshold level in existence 1741
at the time of the adjustment. 1742
Sec. 4115.04. (A)(1) Every public authority authorized to 1743
contract for or construct with its own forces a public 1744
improvement, before advertising for bids or undertaking such 1745
construction with its own forces, shall have the director of 1746
commerce determine the prevailing rates of wages of mechanics 1747
and laborers in accordance with section 4115.05 of the Revised 1748
Code for the class of work called for by the public improvement, 1749
in the locality where the work is to be performed. Except as 1750
provided in division (A)(2) of this section, that schedule of 1751
wages shall be attached to and made part of the specifications 1752
for the work, and shall be printed on the bidding blanks where 1753

H. B. No. 513 Page 61
As Introduced
the work is done by contract. A copy of the bidding blank shall 1754
be filed with the director before the contract is awarded. A 1755
minimum rate of wages for common laborers, on work coming under 1756
the jurisdiction of the department of transportation, shall be 1757
fixed in each county of the state by the department of 1758
transportation, in accordance with section 4115.05 of the 1759
Revised Code. 1760
(2) In the case of contracts that are administered by the 1761
department of natural resources, the director of natural 1762
resources or the director's designee shall include language in 1763
the contracts requiring wage rate determinations and updates to 1764
be obtained directly from the department of commerce through 1765
electronic or other means as appropriate. Contracts that include 1766
this requirement are exempt from the requirements established in 1767
division (A)(1) of this section that involve attaching the 1768
schedule of wages to the specifications for the work, making the 1769
schedule part of those specifications, and printing the schedule 1770
on the bidding blanks where the work is done by contract. 1771
(B) Sections 4115.03 to 4115.16 of the Revised Code do not 1772
apply to: 1773
(1) Public improvements in any case where the federal 1774
government or any of its agencies furnishes by loan or grant all 1775
or any part of the funds used in constructing such improvements, 1776
provided that the federal government or any of its agencies 1777
prescribes predetermined minimum wages to be paid to mechanics 1778
and laborers employed in the construction of such improvements; 1779
(2) A participant in a work activity, developmental 1780
activity, or an alternative work activity under sections 5107.40 1781
to 5107.69 of the Revised Code when a public authority directly 1782
uses the labor of the participant to construct a public 1783

H. B. No. 513 Page 62
As Introduced
improvement if the participant is not engaged in paid employment 1784
or subsidized employment pursuant to the activity; 1785
(3) Public Except as provided in division (C) of this 1786
section, public improvements undertaken by, or under contract 1787
for, the board of education of any school district or the 1788
governing board of any educational service center; 1789
(4) Public improvements undertaken by, or under contract 1790
for, a county hospital operated pursuant to Chapter 339. of the 1791
Revised Code or a municipal hospital operated pursuant to 1792
Chapter 749. of the Revised Code if none of the funds used in 1793
constructing the improvements are the proceeds of bonds or other 1794
obligations that are secured by the full faith and credit of the 1795
state, a county, a township, or a municipal corporation and none 1796
of the funds used in constructing the improvements, including 1797
funds used to repay any amounts borrowed to construct the 1798
improvements, are funds that have been appropriated for that 1799
purpose by the state, a board of county commissioners, a 1800
township, or a municipal corporation from funds generated by the 1801
levy of a tax, provided that a county hospital or municipal 1802
hospital may elect to apply sections 4115.03 to 4115.16 of the 1803
Revised Code to a public improvement undertaken by, or under 1804
contract for, the hospital a political subdivision, special 1805
district, or state institution of higher education; 1806
(5) (4) Any project described in divisions (D)(1)(a) to 1807
(D)(1)(e) of section 176.05 of the Revised Code; 1808
(6) Public improvements undertaken by, or under contract 1809
for, a port authority as defined in section 4582.01 or 4582.21 1810
of the Revised Code; 1811
(7) (5) Any portion of a public improvement undertaken and 1812

H. B. No. 513 Page 63
As Introduced
completed solely with labor donated by the individuals 1813
performing the labor, by a labor organization and its members, 1814
or by a contractor or subcontractor that donates all labor and 1815
materials for that portion of the public improvement project. 1816
(C) Subject to division (D) of this section, nothing in 1817
sections 4115.03 to 4115.21 of the Revised Code or any other 1818
provision of the Revised Code prohibits a political subdivision, 1819
special district, or state institution of higher education from 1820
electing to apply sections 4115.03 to 4115.21 of the Revised 1821
Code to any public improvement undertaken by, or under contract 1822
for, the political subdivision, special district, or state 1823
institution of higher education. 1824
(D) Under no circumstances shall a public authority, 1825
political subdivision, special district, or state institution of 1826
higher education apply the prevailing wage requirements of this 1827
chapter to a any of the following: 1828
(1) A public improvement that is exempt under division (B) 1829
(3) of this section undertaken by, or under contract for, a 1830
board of education of any school district or the governing board 1831
of any educational service center; 1832
(2) An improvement authorized by section 940.06 of the 1833
Revised Code that is constructed pursuant to a contract with a 1834
soil and water conservation district, as defined in section 1835
940.01 of the Revised Code, or performed as a result of a 1836
petition filed pursuant to Chapter 6131., 6133., or 6135. of the 1837
Revised Code, wherein not less than seventy-five per cent of the 1838
project is located on private land and not less than seventy- 1839
five per cent of the cost of the improvement is paid for by 1840
private property owners pursuant to Chapter 940., 6131., 6133., 1841
or 6135. of the Revised Code; 1842

H. B. No. 513 Page 64
As Introduced
(3) The construction of an erosion control structure under 1843
section 1506.44 of the Revised Code. 1844
Sec. 4115.06. In all cases where any public authority 1845
fixes a prevailing rate of wages under section 4115.04 of the 1846
Revised Code, and the work is done by contract, the contract 1847
executed between the public authority and the successful bidder 1848
shall contain a provision requiring the successful bidder and 1849
all his subcontractors to pay a rate of wages which shall not be 1850
less than the rate of wages so fixed. The successful bidder and 1851
all his subcontractors shall comply strictly with the wage 1852
provisions of the contract. 1853
Where a public authority constructs a public improvement 1854
with its own forces, such public authority shall pay a rate of 1855
wages which shall not be less than the rate of wages fixed as 1856
provided in section 4115.04 of the Revised Code, except in those 1857
instances provided for in sections 723.52, section 5517.02, 1858
5575.01, and 5543.19 of the Revised Code. 1859
Sec. 5540.03. (A) A transportation improvement district 1860
may: 1861
(1) Adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the 1862
conduct of its business; 1863
(2) Adopt an official seal; 1864
(3) Sue and be sued in its own name, plead and be 1865
impleaded, provided any actions against the district shall be 1866
brought in the court of common pleas of the county in which the 1867
principal office of the district is located, or in the court of 1868
common pleas of the county in which the cause of action arose, 1869
and all summonses, exceptions, and notices of every kind shall 1870
be served on the district by leaving a copy thereof at its 1871

H. B. No. 513 Page 65
As Introduced
principal office with the secretary-treasurer; 1872
(4) Purchase, fund, finance, construct, maintain, repair, 1873
sell, exchange, police, operate, or lease projects; 1874
(5) Issue either or both of the following for the purpose 1875
of providing funds to pay the costs of any project or part 1876
thereof: 1877
(a) Transportation improvement district revenue bonds; 1878
(b) Bonds pursuant to Section 13 of Article VIII, Ohio 1879
Constitution. 1880
(6) Maintain such funds as it considers necessary; 1881
(7) Direct its agents or employees, when properly 1882
identified in writing and after at least five days' written 1883
notice, to enter upon lands within its jurisdiction to make 1884
surveys and examinations preliminary to the location and 1885
construction of projects for the district, without liability of 1886
the district or its agents or employees except for actual damage 1887
done; 1888
(8) Make and enter into all contracts and agreements 1889
necessary or incidental to the performance of its functions and 1890
the execution of its powers under this chapter; 1891
(9) Employ or retain or contract for the services of 1892
consulting engineers, superintendents, managers, and such other 1893
engineers, construction and accounting experts, auditors, 1894
financial advisers, trustees, marketing, remarketing, and 1895
administrative agents, attorneys, and other employees, 1896
independent contractors, or agents as are necessary in its 1897
judgment and fix their compensation, provided all such expenses 1898
shall be payable solely from the proceeds of bonds or from 1899

H. B. No. 513 Page 66
As Introduced
revenues; 1900
(10) Receive and accept from the federal or any state or 1901
local government, including, but not limited to, any agency, 1902
entity, or instrumentality of any of the foregoing, loans and 1903
grants for or in aid of the construction, maintenance, or repair 1904
of any project, and receive and accept aid or contributions from 1905
any source or person of money, property, labor, or other things 1906
of value, to be held, used, and applied only for the purposes 1907
for which such loans, grants, and contributions are made. 1908
Nothing in division (A)(10) of this section shall be construed 1909
as imposing any liability on this state for any loan received by 1910
a transportation improvement district from a third party unless 1911
this state has entered into an agreement to accept such 1912
liability. 1913
(11) Acquire, hold, and dispose of property in the 1914
exercise of its powers and the performance of its duties under 1915
this chapter; 1916
(12) Establish and collect tolls or user charges for its 1917
projects; 1918
(13) Subject to section 5540.18 of the Revised Code, enter 1919
into an agreement with a contiguous board of county 1920
commissioners other than the board of county commissioners that 1921
created the transportation improvement district, for the 1922
district to exercise all or any portion of its powers with 1923
respect to a project that is located wholly or partially within 1924
the county that is party to the agreement; 1925
(14) Cooperate with any governmental agencies in the 1926
planning, design, acquisition, construction, maintenance, 1927
funding, and financing of projects, including qualifying 1928

H. B. No. 513 Page 67
As Introduced
projects. In doing so, the district may enter into agreements 1929
with other governmental agencies to plan, design, acquire, 1930
construct, maintain, fund, and finance the projects or 1931
qualifying projects and to use pledged or assigned sales and use 1932
tax revenue to pay the debt service on qualifying bonds. 1933
(15) Enter into an agreement with the board of county 1934
commissioners that created the transportation improvement 1935
district and with the boards of county commissioners of any 1936
contiguous group of counties to exercise all powers of the 1937
district with respect to a project that is both of the 1938
following: 1939
(a) Located partially or wholly within any county that is 1940
a party to the agreement; 1941
(b) Partially funded with federal money. 1942
(16) Do all acts necessary and proper to carry out the 1943
powers expressly granted in this chapter. 1944
(B)(1)(B) Chapters 123., 124., 125., and 153., and 1945
sections 9.331 to 9.335 and 307.86 of the Revised Code do not 1946
apply to contracts or projects of a transportation improvement 1947
district. 1948
(2) A transportation improvement district is subject to 1949
sections 4115.03 to 4115.21 and 4115.99 of the Revised Code, 1950
unless the amount of state or local government funds, including, 1951
but not limited to, those provided by any agency, entity, or 1952
instrumentality of the state or a local government as described 1953
in division (A)(10) of this section received for the contract or 1954
project, is, in the aggregate, less than the amounts described 1955
in or calculated under section 4115.03 of the Revised Code. 1956
(C) A transportation improvement district may contract 1957

H. B. No. 513 Page 68
As Introduced
with the prosecuting attorney of a county, as provided in 1958
section 309.09 of the Revised Code, to obtain legal services 1959
from the prosecuting attorney. 1960
Sec. 6117.012. (A) A board of county commissioners may 1961
adopt rules requiring owners of property within the district 1962
whose property is served by a connection to sewers maintained 1963
and operated by the board or to sewers that are connected to 1964
interceptor sewers maintained and operated by the board to do 1965
any of the following: 1966
(1) Disconnect storm water inflows to sanitary sewers 1967
maintained and operated by the board and not operated as a 1968
combined sewer, or to connections with those sewers; 1969
(2) Disconnect non-storm water inflows to storm water 1970
sewers maintained and operated by the board and not operated as 1971
a combined sewer, or to connections with those storm water 1972
sewers; 1973
(3) Reconnect or relocate any such disconnected inflows in 1974
compliance with board rules and applicable building codes, 1975
health codes, or other relevant codes; 1976
(4) Prevent sewer back-ups into properties that have 1977
experienced one or more back-ups of sanitary or combined sewers 1978
maintained and operated by the board; 1979
(5) Prevent storm water from entering a combined sewer and 1980
causing an overflow or an inflow to a sanitary sewer, which 1981
prevention may include projects or programs that separate the 1982
storm water from a combined sewer or that utilize a prevention 1983
or replacement facility to prevent or minimize storm water from 1984
entering a combined sewer or a sanitary sewer. 1985
(B) Any inflow required to be disconnected or any sewer 1986

H. B. No. 513 Page 69
As Introduced
back-up required to be prevented under a rule adopted pursuant 1987
to divisions (A)(1) to (4) of this section constitutes a 1988
nuisance subject to injunctive relief and abatement pursuant to 1989
Chapter 3767. of the Revised Code or as otherwise permitted by 1990
law. 1991
(C) A board of county commissioners may use sewer district 1992
funds; county general fund moneys; the proceeds of bonds issued 1993
under Chapter 133. or 165. of the Revised Code; and, to the 1994
extent permitted by their terms, loans, grants, or other moneys 1995
from appropriate state or federal funds, for either of the 1996
following: 1997
(1) The cost of disconnections, reconnections, 1998
relocations, combined sewer overflow prevention, or sewer back- 1999
up prevention required by rules adopted pursuant to division (A) 2000
of this section, performed by the county or under contract with 2001
the county; 2002
(2) Payments to the property owner or a contractor hired 2003
by the property owner pursuant to a competitive process 2004
established by district rules, for the cost of disconnections, 2005
reconnections, relocations, combined sewer overflow prevention, 2006
or sewer back-up prevention required by rules adopted pursuant 2007
to division (A) of this section after the board, pursuant to its 2008
rules, has approved the work to be performed and after the 2009
county has received from the property owner a statement 2010
releasing the county from all liability in connection with the 2011
disconnections, reconnections, relocations, combined sewer 2012
overflow prevention, or sewer back-up prevention. 2013
(D) Except as provided in division (E) of this section, 2014
the board of county commissioners shall require in its rules 2015
regarding disconnections, reconnections, relocations of sewers, 2016

H. B. No. 513 Page 70
As Introduced
combined sewer overflow prevention, or sewer back-up prevention 2017
the reimbursement of moneys expended pursuant to division (C) of 2018
this section by either of the following methods: 2019
(1) A charge to the property owner in the amount of the 2020
payment made pursuant to division (C) of this section for 2021
immediate payment or payment in installments with interest as 2022
determined by the board not to exceed ten per cent, which 2023
payments may be billed as a separate item with the rents charged 2024
to that owner for use of the sewers. The board may approve 2025
installment payments for a period of not more than fifteen 2026
years. If charges are to be paid in installments, the board 2027
shall certify to the county auditor information sufficient to 2028
identify each subject parcel of property, the total of the 2029
charges to be paid in installments, and the total number of 2030
installments to be paid. The auditor shall record the 2031
information in the sewer improvement record until these charges 2032
are paid in full. Charges not paid when due shall be certified 2033
to the county auditor, who shall place the charges upon the real 2034
property tax list and duplicate against that property. Those 2035
charges shall be a lien on the property from the date they are 2036
placed on the tax list and duplicate and shall be collected in 2037
the same manner as other taxes. 2038
(2) A special assessment levied against the property, 2039
payable in the number of years the board determines, not to 2040
exceed fifteen years, with interest as determined by the board 2041
not to exceed ten per cent. The board shall certify the 2042
assessments to the county auditor, stating the amount and time 2043
of payment. The auditor shall record the information in the 2044
county sewer improvement record, showing separately the 2045
assessments to be collected, and shall place the assessments 2046
upon the real property tax list and duplicate for collection. 2047

H. B. No. 513 Page 71
As Introduced
The assessments shall be a lien on the property from the date 2048
they are placed on the tax list and duplicate and shall be 2049
collected in the same manner as other taxes. 2050
(E) The county may adopt a resolution specifying a maximum 2051
amount of the cost of any disconnection, reconnection, 2052
relocation, combined sewer overflow prevention, or sewer back-up 2053
prevention required pursuant to division (A) of this section 2054
that may be paid by the county for each affected parcel of 2055
property without requiring reimbursement. That amount may be 2056
allowed only if there is a building code, health code, or other 2057
relevant code, or a federally imposed or state-imposed consent 2058
decree that is filed or otherwise recorded in a court of 2059
competent jurisdiction, applicable to the affected parcel that 2060
prohibits in the future any inflows, combined sewer overflows, 2061
or sewer back-ups not allowed under rules adopted pursuant to 2062
division (A)(1), (4), or (5) of this section. The board, by 2063
rule, shall establish criteria for determining how much of the 2064
maximum amount for each qualifying parcel need not be 2065
reimbursed. 2066
(F) Disconnections, reconnections, relocations, combined 2067
sewer overflow prevention, or sewer back-up prevention required 2068
under this section and performed by a contractor under contract 2069
with the property owner shall not be considered a public 2070
improvement, and those performed by the county shall be 2071
considered a public improvement as defined in section 4115.03 of 2072
the Revised Code. 2073
Disconnections, reconnections, relocations, combined sewer 2074
overflow prevention, or sewer back-up prevention required under 2075
this section performed by a contractor under contract with the 2076
property owner shall not be subject to competitive bidding or 2077

H. B. No. 513 Page 72
As Introduced
public bond laws. 2078
(G) Property owners shall be responsible for maintaining 2079
any improvements made or facilities constructed on private 2080
property to reconnect or relocate disconnected inflows, for 2081
combined sewer overflow prevention, or for sewer back-up 2082
prevention pursuant to this section unless a public easement or 2083
other agreement exists for the county to maintain that 2084
improvement or facility. 2085
(H) A board of county commissioners may provide rate 2086
reductions of and credits against charges for the use of sewers 2087
to a property owner that implements a project or program that 2088
prevents storm water from entering a combined sewer and causing 2089
an overflow. Such a project or program may include the use of a 2090
prevention or replacement facility to handle storm water that 2091
has been separated from a combined sewer. The revised rates or 2092
charges shall be collected and paid to the county treasurer in 2093
accordance with section 6117.02 of the Revised Code. 2094
Sec. 6121.061. The Ohio water development authority shall 2095
not issue any bonds or otherwise participate in any project 2096
authorized by this chapter or Chapter 6123. of the Revised Code 2097
unless the contract, resolution, or other written document 2098
setting forth the board's participation specifies that all wages 2099
paid to laborers and mechanics employed on the projects shall be 2100
paid at the prevailing rates of wages of laborers and mechanics 2101
for the class of work called for by the project, which wages 2102
shall be determined in accordance with the requirements of 2103
Chapter 4115. of the Revised Code for determination of 2104
prevailing wage rates, provided that the requirements of this 2105
section do not apply to loans made to boards of county 2106
commissioners under division (V) of section 6121.04 of the 2107

H. B. No. 513 Page 73
As Introduced
Revised Code or where the federal government or any of its 2108
agencies furnishes by loan or grant all or any part of the funds 2109
used in connection with the project and prescribes predetermined 2110
minimum wages to be paid to the laborers and mechanics, and 2111
provided that if a non-public user beneficiary of the project 2112
undertakes, as part of the project, construction to be performed 2113
by its regular bargaining unit employees who are covered under a 2114
collective bargaining agreement that was in existence prior to 2115
the date of the commitment instrument setting forth the board's 2116
participation, the rate of pay provided under the collective 2117
bargaining agreement may be paid to those employees. 2118
Section 2. That existing sections 164.07, 307.022, 2119
307.671, 307.673, 307.674, 307.696, 308.21, 351.06, 353.03, 2120
1506.44, 1710.02, 4115.03, 4115.034, 4115.04, 4115.06, 5540.03, 2121
6117.012, and 6121.061 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. 2122
Section 3. The amendments made by this act to sections 2123
164.07, 307.022, 307.671, 307.673, 307.674, 307.696, 308.21, 2124
351.06, 353.03, 1506.44, 1710.02, 4115.03, 4115.04, 4115.06, 2125
5540.03, 6117.012, and 6121.061 of the Revised Code apply to 2126
contracts entered into, renewed, or extended on or after the 2127
effective date of this section. 2128